10-K 1 ueec_10k.htm FORM 10-K
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K
 
x ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
 
FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018
 
COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-27781
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
Nevada 84-1517723
(State of jurisdiction of incorporation or
organization)(I.R.S. Employee Identiﬁcation Number)
   
10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209
Henderson, NV 89052
(Address of principal executive oﬃces) (Zip Code)
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (877) 358-3444
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (b) of the Act: None
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (g) of the Act: Common Stock, $.001 Par Value
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the
Securities Act. Yes ¨ No x
 
Check whether the Registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange
Act. ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or
15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period
that the Registrant was required to ﬁle such reports) and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling requirements
for the past 90 days. Yes x No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically on its corporate Web site, if
any, every Interactive data ﬁle required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405
of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to submit such ﬁles). Yes ¨ No x
 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent ﬁlers in response to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not
contained in this form, and no disclosure will be contained, to the best of Registrant's knowledge, in
deﬁnitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in part III of this Form 10-K or any
amendment to this Form 10 K ¨.
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-
accelerated ﬁler, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of
"large accelerated ﬁler," "accelerated ﬁler," "smaller reporting company" and “emerging growth company”
in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
Large accelerated ﬁler ¨ Accelerated ﬁler ¨
Non-accelerated ﬁler ¨ Smaller reporting companyx
   Emerging growth
company ¨
  
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the
extended transition period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided
pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. Yes ¨ No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act). Yes ¨ No x
 
As of June 29, 2018, the number of shares held by non-aﬃliates was approximately 167,000,000 shares.
The approximate market value based on the last sale (i.e. $0.84 per share as of June 29, 2018, the last
business day of the second quarter) of the Company's Common Stock was approximately $140,280,000.
 
The number of shares issued and outstanding of the Registrant's Common Stock, as of April 1, 2019 was
174,493,138, excluding restricted stock units issued to oﬃcers, directors and consultants covering
49,600,000 shares to be issued upon a change in control of the Company as described herein. See “Item
11.”
 
 
 
 
 
  
Forward-looking Statements
 
Statements in this annual report on Form 10-K that are not historical facts constitute forward-looking
statements which are made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of Section 21E of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, or the Exchange Act. These statements relate to future events or our future ﬁnancial
performance and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause our or
our industry's actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to be materially diﬀerent
from any future results, levels of activity, performance or achievements expressed or implied by these
forward-looking statements. Those factors include, among other things, those listed under "Risk Factors"
and elsewhere in this annual report. In some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements by
terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "expects," "plans," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates,"
"predicts," "potential" or "continue" or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These
statements are only predictions. Actual events or results may diﬀer materially. Moreover, neither we nor
any other person assumes responsibility.
 
 
2
 
 
  
PART I
 
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
 
Company Overview
 
United Health Products, Inc. ("UHP" or the "Company") develops, manufactures, and markets a
patented hemostatic gauze for the healthcare and wound care sectors. The product, HemoStyp®, is
derived from all natural, regenerated oxidized cellulose and designed to absorb exudate/drainage from
superﬁcial wounds and help control bleeding. The Company sells its product to the veterinarian, dental,
medical, military and sports markets, each of which represents a multi-million-dollar market opportunity
for the Company. We also sell products aimed at the consumer market via Walmart.com. We are currently
in the process of seeking regulatory approval to sell products into the U.S. Class III surgical market.
 
Recent Developments
 
The following developments in the Company’s business have occurred since the beginning of 2018:
 
 ·In February 2018, the Company completed and submitted to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
(“FDA”) all materials relevant for the pre-market approval (“PMA”) for HemoStyp under the FDA’s
new and innovative CtQ Pilot-Program as a Class III application for internal surgical procedures.
The CtQ Pilot Program was created to identify products that have a chemical makeup of
demonstrated safe interaction with the body – as evidenced by years of prior product usage and
studies – to be approved for Class III internal surgical use. The FDA reviewed UHP’s HemoStyp as
one of the participants for the program.
   
 ·The Company’s 2” x 4” Trauma Gauze™ product has been selected as the feature component for a
new Advanced Wound Care Kit for Dick’s Sporting Goods (NYSE DKS). With today’s environment
when the unexpected can happen anywhere, both in the wild and in urban areas, having an
advanced trauma kit can be the diﬀerence between survival and tragedy. The Hemostyp pouches
have been included under the Field and Stream label and are available in their stores nationwide
since February 2018.
   
 ·In January 2018, the Company’s distribution partner, Quantum Health Group, ﬁled an application
for Class III use in general internal surgical procedures with the Ministry of Food and Drug Safety
(“MFDS”) in South Korea. The Ministry of Food and Drug Safety provides the vision of "Safe Food
and Drug, Healthy People, Well-being Society" and making extensive eﬀorts to safeguard
consumers and promote the public health by ensuring the safety of all foods, drugs, cosmetics,
herbal medicines, and medical devices. Quantum received a response requiring additional data
and testing. The Company intends to respond to the request and complete our application
following the expected FDA Class III approval.
 
 
3
 
 
 
 ·In March 2018, the Company obtained Class III and CE mark approval for HemoStyp in the
European Economic Area (EEA). The EEA comprises the 28 European Union members and certain
other countries. Accordingly, HemoStyp was approved for use in internal surgical procedures in
more than 30 countries. This approval expired in August of 2018 and a new application will be
prepared in conjunction with the new CE standards for Class III following the expected FDA Class
III approval. The EEA approval was granted following the provision of all required documentation
to the relevant regulatory agencies. The CE marking– CE is an acronym for the French term
"Conformité Européenne"– certiﬁes that a product has met EEA health, safety, and environmental
requirements, which ensure consumer safety. Manufacturers in the EEA and abroad must meet CE
marking requirements where applicable to market their products in Europe. A manufacturer who
has gone through the conformity assessment process may aﬃx the CE mark to its product. With
the CE marking, the product may be marketed throughout the EEA and certain other countries,
with a combined population exceeding 517 million and a GDP greater than $17 trillion.
   
 ·In July 2018, the Company announced that it has been accepted as a Walmart.com supplier and
oﬀers two HemoStyp wound care products for online retail sale. Hemostrips® Hemostatic
Bandages and Boo-boo Strip Hemostatic Bandages.
   
 ·On August 8, 2018, the Company announced that its protocol submission for human testing had
been reviewed by the FDA in furtherance of our eﬀorts to achieve Class III approval for the product
in the U.S. This FDA review was provided to the Institutional Review Board (IRB) for protocol and
hospital site approval. UHP started the human trial study in November. The IRB is a committee
that is independent of the FDA, and that is formally designated to approve, monitor, and review
biomedical and behavioral research involving humans. The purpose of the IRB is to assure that
appropriate steps are taken to protect the rights and welfare of humans participating as subjects
in a research study. The Company’s human trial protocol calls for the application of HemoStyp in
abdominal, cardiovascular thoracic and vascular surgical procedures to control bleeding sites.
Prior to ﬁnalizing its human trial protocol, we submitted a Q-Sub – a request for FDA review — to
the FDA, in conjunction with its previously ﬁled Class III PMA submission application.
   
 ·The IRB approved HemoStyp human trial is a prospective, non-inferiority, multi-center,
randomized, open-label trial to observe HemoStyp in the management of bleeding during surgery;
and, to assess the eﬃcacy and safety of HemoStyp as an adjunct for management of secondary
hemostasis in an operative setting. Our independently developed protocol has established
endpoints for bleeding control.
   
 ·We expect that the human trials will be the last step to clear in obtaining FDA PMA Class III
approval for HemoStyp. We have recruited a team of leading surgeons to conduct the study, and
our lead investigator has successfully conducted over 20 medical device studies. We aim to
complete this ﬁnal regulatory stage as part of our strategy to supply the domestic and
international hemostasis surgical markets.
   
 ·On October 25, 2018, the Company announced that, in connection with the FDA PMA Class III
approval process for HemoStyp, UHP has been contacted by several medical technology
companies that are active in the surgical equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who
had expressed an interest in the Company's products and business strategy. In response to these
inbound contacts, and to maximize shareholder value, the Company's board of directors has
determined to conduct a review of strategic alternatives, which include a potential sale of the
Company, joint venture or other commercial partnership, or a standalone growth plan. To assist in
this review, the Company has retained Société Générale to serve as ﬁnancial advisor to the
Company and it has retained the law ﬁrm of Ruskin Moscou Faltischek PC to assist in the strategic
review. There can be no assurances that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of the
retention of these ﬁrms.
 
 
4
 
 
 
Our HemoStyp Gauze Products
 
HemoStyp Hemostatic Gauze is a collagen-like natural substance created from chemically treated
cellulose. It is an eﬀective hemostatic agent registered with the FDA to help control bleeding from open
wounds and body cavities. The HemoStyp hemostatic material contains no chemical additives, thrombin or
collagen, and is hypoallergenic. When the product comes in contact with blood it expands slightly and
converts to an adhesive gel that subsequently dissolves into glucose and saline. Because of its purity and
the fact that it simply degrades to non-toxic end products, HemoStyp does not cause signiﬁcant delay in
healing as do certain other hemostatic materials. Additional testing has shown HemoStyp to be 100%
absorbable in 24 hours or less. Tests have also been conducted to demonstrate the eﬀectiveness of
HemoStyp in thoracic and abdominal procedures. The Company continues to test for the eﬀectiveness and
the IFU (Instructions for Use) for abdominal and thoracic procedures.
 
HemoStyp Hemostatic Gauze is a ﬂexible cloth-like material that is applied by folding the gauze as
needed to ﬁt the size of the wound or incision, and then placing the gauze onto the bleeding tissue. In
surgical situations, the product converts to a transparent gel with a neutral pH level that allows the
surgeon to monitor the coagulation process and also avoids damage to the surrounding tissue. In ﬁrst
responder or other non-surgical situations, putting a bandage on top of the gauze is optional and, in many
cases, unnecessary. Since EMS (Emergency Medical Services) work is pre-hospital, rinsing the gauze out
with saline or water is not necessary, as a wound will be debrided and possibly reopened prior to suturing
at the hospital.
 
Our hemostatic gauze product line includes various conﬁgurations which have been developed to
address the speciﬁc needs of our market segments and our existing customers, including the U.S. military.
Our HemoStyp gauze products are sold in diﬀerent sizes for use in superﬁcial trauma cases, as a dental
gauze and as a nasal dressing, and in a range of formats for veterinary applications, among others uses.
The Company's hemostatic gauze product line now includes the following products:
 
 ·Veterinary Market type Products;
·Dental gauze for oral surgery;
·Several formats of Trauma Gauze™ for battleﬁeld trauma;
Adhesive bandages for use by consumers on cuts and abrasions; and,
·Island dressings to support intravenous procedures such as kidney dialysis.
 
Existing and Potential Target Markets
 
Our technology is marketed as HemoStyp Gauze but is also available to customers with customized
private labeling. We are customer driven. We distribute both nationally and internationally. We are
servicing (or intend to service) our customers through distributors, sales representatives, industry-
specialized telephone support, and the Internet. Our current and potential customer base for our HemoStyp
includes, without limitation:
 
·Hospitals and Surgery Centers for all Internal Surgical usage, post FDA Class III approval
 ·Hospitals, Clinics and Physicians – For external trauma
·EMS, Fire Departments and Other First Responders
·Public Safety, Police Departments and Military
·Correctional Facilities
·Schools, Universities and Day Care Facilities
·Nursing Homes and Assisted Living Environments
·Home Care Providers
·Dental oﬃces
·Sports Medicine Providers
·Veterinarians
·Municipalities and Government Agencies and
·Occupational and Industrial Healthcare Professionals
Consumers
 
 
5
 
 
  
Primary Strategy
 
We believe that the Class III surgical markets, both domestic and international, represent the most
attractive market for our products due to the limited competition from other Class III approved ORC
(Oxidized Regenerated Cellulose) products and the resulting premium pricing for hemostatic agents that
can meet the demanding requirements of the human surgical environment. In addition, our preliminary
tests lead us to believe that the HemoStyp technology can compete successfully against established
market participants and allow us to gain market share. Given this assessment, we have devoted
considerable resources in 2018 and currently to completing the FDA process and gaining access to this
market in the U.S.
 
In February 2018, the Company completed and submitted to the FDA all materials relevant for the
pre-market approval (“PMA”) for HemoStyp as a Class III application for internal surgical procedures. The
2017 U.S. market for hemostatic products used in internal surgery procedures is estimated at in excess of
US$7 billion, of which the market for ORC or similar mechanical hemostatic products is estimated to be
US$3.38 billion. This market is expected to grow at 6.2% annually to reach $4.57 billion by 2023 (source:
October 2018 Market Data Forecast).
 
In anticipation of receiving Class III approval, our strategy is to devote resources and seek
partnerships that allow us to penetrate this market along with the other markets to which the Company
already has access. We are evaluating the best paths to rapidly grow our revenue and proﬁts, which could
include commercial partnerships and licensing agreement with established market participants, in addition
or as an alternative to raising the necessary capital to establish and grow our own marketing and
distribution capabilities. We will carefully evaluate the returns on investment in each addressable market
to ensure the judicious deployment of our capital to create shareholder value.
 
We believe that refocusing the Company to become a stronger, medical technology corporation
with a patented technology will enhance the Company’s value and overall market strength and allows for
revenue generation via organic growth. Nevertheless, we have engaged Société Générale as described
under “Recent Developments” to advise the Company on potential strategic alternatives including the
possible sale of the Company and/or its intellectual assets. In the event that a transaction is not completed
on terms satisfactory to the Company, if at all, the Company would require substantial additional ﬁnancing
to execute an organic business development strategy addressing all of its intended markets.
 
Manufacturing and Packaging of our Products        
 
The Company's gauze products are manufactured to our speciﬁcations at various facilities. We have
established various contract manufacturing facilities to replace our original agreement with Hemo
Manufacturing. All of these facilities have been carefully vetted and have supplied multiple Quality Control
program certiﬁcates and are registered FDA facilities. These facilities have been conﬁrmed as part of our
PMA submission, which includes the FDA inspection records of these facilities. We are ﬁnalizing the move
of most of the Company’s manufacturing operation to the United States but will maintain an overseas
supply solution for our adhesive retail products.  
 
Patents and Trademarks
 
In September 2012, the Company announced that its hemostatic gauze products were granted
patent protection by the U.S. Patent and Trademark Oﬃce, which patent protection currently runs through
2029. However, if our intellectual property positions are challenged, invalidated, circumvented or expire, or
if we fail to prevail in future intellectual property litigation, our business could be adversely aﬀected. We
have created multiple variations of our gauze product and will protect each of these new generation
platforms and product with additional intellectual property. Our success depends in part on our ability to
defend our intellectual property rights. The patent positions of pharmaceutical and biotechnology
companies can be highly uncertain and often involve complex legal, scientiﬁc and factual questions. Third
parties may seek to challenge, invalidate or circumvent our intellectual property rights. In addition, our
patent positions might not protect us against competitors with similar products or technologies because
competing products or technologies may not infringe our patents. Also, there are third parties who have
patents or pending patent applications that they may claim necessitate payment of a royalty or prevent us
from commercializing our patent in certain territories. Patent disputes are frequent, costly and can
preclude, delay or increase the cost of commercialization of products.
 
 
6
 
 
 
The Company has also received the following from the USPTO:
 
Boo Boo Strips: Will be published for opposition on March 26, 2019. If no opposition, the Company should
receive the mark by the end of April 2019.
 
The Ultimate Bandage: Notice of publication has not been received but was approved by the examining
attorney at the same time as Boo Boo Strips.
 
Hemostrips: To be reviewed by the examining attorney in April 2019.
 
Nik Fix: The Company has prepared the application and will be submitted in May 2019.
 
Competition
 
The disposable medical supply market in the United States is dominated by large companies such
as Baxter International, Bristol-Myers Squibb Company, Johnson & Johnson and 3M Company.
Our hemostatic gauze product will directly compete in the gauze markets dominated by these majors.
However, the market for hemostatic products, which includes gauzes, gels, bandages and powders, is
largely composed of smaller, privately-held companies with the exception of Johnson & Johnson, which
manufactures SurgicelÒ. In this market, competitive factors include price, product oﬀerings, value-added
service programs, service and delivery, credit terms, and customer support.
 
Government Regulation
 
We are subject to oversight by various federal and state governmental entities and we are subject
to, and aﬀected by, a variety of federal and state laws, regulations and policies.
 
The U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration ("DEA"), the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA")
and various state regulatory authorities regulate the purchase, storage, and/or distribution of
pharmaceutical products. The DEA, FDA and state regulatory authorities have broad enforcement powers,
including the ability to seize or recall products and impose signiﬁcant criminal, civil and administrative
sanctions for violations of applicable laws and regulations. As a wholesale distributor of pharmaceuticals
and certain related products, we are subject to these laws and regulations. We must have all necessary
licenses and other regulatory approvals and are required to be in compliance with all applicable
pharmaceutical wholesale distribution requirements needed to conduct our operations. See “Recent
Developments.”
 
In recent years, some states have passed or proposed laws and regulations that are intended to
protect the safety of the pharmaceutical supply channel. These laws and regulations are designed to
prevent the introduction of counterfeit, diverted, adulterated or mislabeled pharmaceuticals into the
distribution system. In addition, the FDA Amendments Act of 2007 (the "2007 Act") requires the FDA to
establish standards and identify and validate eﬀective technologies for the purpose of securing the
pharmaceutical supply chain against counterfeit drugs. These standards may include track-and-trace or
authentication technologies, such as radio frequency identiﬁcation devices and other technologies. The
2007 Act required the FDA to develop a standardized numerical identiﬁer by April 1, 2010.
 
As a result of political, economic and regulatory inﬂuences, the healthcare delivery industry in the
United States is under intense scrutiny and subject to fundamental changes. Although there was
substantial Federal legislation enacted during 2010 that impacted our healthcare system in the United
States, we expect that the administration, Congress and certain state legislatures will continue to review
and assess alternative healthcare delivery systems and payment methods in order to reform the
healthcare system. Thus, we cannot predict the impact on us of the 2010 legislation and/or additional
regulation governing the delivery or pricing of healthcare products that may be passed. Nor can we predict
the impact on us of potential changes to the structure of the present healthcare delivery system, if any,
when they may be adopted.
 
The costs associated with complying with federal and state regulations could be signiﬁcant and the
failure to comply with any such legal requirements could have a signiﬁcant impact on our results of
operations and ﬁnancial condition.
 
 
7
 
 
 
Environmental Matters
 
Our business activities are subject to extensive federal, state, and local environmental laws and
regulations relating to water, air, hazardous substances and wastes that may restrict or limit such business
activities. Although the Company does not currently directly manufacture its own products, we may still be
subject to existing environmental laws by way of regulatory agencies or other third-party claimants.
Examples of U.S. Federal environmental legislation that may have adverse eﬀects on the Company include
the Toxic Substances Control Act, the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, Compensation and Liability Act
(aka CERCLA or Superfund) and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. By no means do we certify
this list as being complete, as there are many laws and regulations that exist or that may come to pass
that we cannot foresee that may also have an impact on the Company. The multitude of regulations issued
by federal, state, provincial and local administrative agencies can be burdensome and costly and we
determined to change our business model as a result. There are currently no pending legal proceedings
with any government regulatory agencies.
 
Research and Development Expenditures
 
In ﬁscal 2018 and 2017, we incurred $76,951 and $19,936, respectively, in research and
development expenditures.
 
 Personnel
 
As of April 1, 2019, we have four full-time employees and up to eight additional consultants,
excluding our eight Medical Advisory Board members.
 
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
 
We are engaged in the sale and distribution of hemostatic gauze products to stop superﬁcial bleeding. As
we develop our business, there are numerous and varied risks, known and unknown, that may prevent us
from achieving our goals. If any of these risks actually occur, our business, ﬁnancial condition or results of
operation may be materially adversely aﬀected. In such case, the trading price of our common stock could
decline, and investors could lose all or part of their investment.
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR BUSINESS
 
We have a history of operating losses and we may continue to lose money in the future
 
For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had a net loss of $6,006,135 and
$934,968, respectively. We have a history of operating losses and we may continue to lose money in the
future
 
We have limited operating history. Accordingly, you will have no basis upon which to evaluate
our ability to achieve our business objectives.
 
We have limited operating history, which makes it diﬃcult for potential investors to evaluate our
business or prospective operations. Our business plan is to develop the U.S. and International market for
the sale of our hemostatic gauze product line. Our plans are subject to all of the risks inherent in the
ﬁnancing, expenditures, complications and delays inherent in a relatively new business. Investors should
evaluate an investment in our Company in light of the uncertainties frequently encountered by companies
developing markets for new products. We may never overcome these obstacles. In addition, our business
is speculative and depends upon the implementation of our business plan and our ability to enter into
agreements with third parties on terms that will be commercially viable for us. There can be no assurance
that our eﬀorts will be successful or that we will be able to attain proﬁtability.
 
 
8
 
 
  
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed substantial doubt about our
ability to continue as a going concern. This could make it more diﬃcult for us to raise funds
and adversely aﬀect our relationships with lenders, investors and suppliers.
 
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed doubt about our ability to continue
as a going concern. This indicates that our auditors believe that substantial doubt exists regarding our
ability to continue to remain in business. We cannot provide any assurance that we will in fact operate our
business proﬁtably or obtain suﬃcient ﬁnancing to sustain our business in the event we are not successful
in our eﬀorts to generate suﬃcient revenue and operating cash ﬂow. The expression of such doubt by our
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm or our inability to overcome the factors leading to such
doubt could have a material adverse eﬀect on our relationships with prospective customers, lenders,
investors and suppliers, and therefore could have a material adverse eﬀect on our business.
 
We can provide no assurances that given that the Class III application for internal
surgical procedures will be approved by the FDA.
 
In February 2018, the Company completed and submitted to the FDA all materials relevant for the
pre-market approval (“PMA”) for HemoStyp under the FDA’s new and innovative CtQ Pilot-Program as a
Class III application for internal surgical procedures. There can be no assurances given that the Class III
application for internal surgical procedures will be approved by the FDA.
 
We can provide no assurances that the retention of a ﬁnancial advisor and a legal counsel to
assist in strategic review will result in the occurrence of a speciﬁc transaction.
 
On October 25, 2018, the Company announced in connection with the FDA PMA Class III approval
process for HemoStyp, UHP has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active
in the surgical equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the
Company's products and business strategy. In response to these inbound contacts, and to maximize
shareholder value, the Company's board of directors has determined to conduct a review of strategic
alternatives, which include a potential sale of the Company, joint venture or other commercial partnership,
or a standalone growth plan. To assist in this review, the Company has retained Société Générale to serve
as ﬁnancial advisor to the Company. There can be no assurances that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as
a result of the retention of this ﬁrm.
 
 We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and fund operations, which
additional ﬁnancing may not be available.
 
We currently have a working capital deﬁcit, minimal cash and limited sales of our products. Our
Chief Executive Oﬃcer is currently providing cash loans to us which are repayable upon demand to meet
our working capital needs. These cash loans can be terminated at any time. As result of the Company's
ﬁnancial position, we may not be able to execute our current business plan and fund business operations
long enough to achieve proﬁtability. Our ultimate success may depend upon our ability to raise additional
capital. There can be no assurance that additional funds will be available when needed from any source or,
if available, will be available on terms that are acceptable to us.
 
We may be required to pursue sources of additional capital through various means, including joint
venture projects and debt or equity ﬁnancings. Future ﬁnancings through equity investments are likely to
be dilutive to existing stockholders. Also, the terms of securities we may issue in future capital
transactions may be more favorable for our new investors. Newly issued securities may include
preferences, superior voting rights, the issuance of warrants or other derivative securities, and the
issuances of incentive awards under equity employee incentive plans, which may have additional dilutive
eﬀects. Further, we may incur substantial costs in pursuing future capital and/or ﬁnancing, including
investment banking fees, legal fees, accounting fees, printing and distribution expenses and other costs.
We may also be required to recognize non-cash expenses in connection with certain securities we may
issue, such as convertible notes and warrants, which will adversely impact our ﬁnancial condition.
 
Our ability to obtain needed ﬁnancing may be impaired by such factors as the capital markets, both
generally and speciﬁcally in the healthcare industry, and the fact that we are not proﬁtable, which could
impact the availability and cost of future ﬁnancings. If the amount of capital we are able to raise from
ﬁnancing activities, together with our revenues from operations, is not suﬃcient to satisfy our capital
needs, even to the extent that we reduce our operations accordingly, we may be required to cease
operations.
 
 
9
 
 
 
No guarantee of market acceptance.
 
Our success is dependent on market acceptance of our hemostatic gauze products. We cannot
assure you that healthcare market professionals will conclude that our hemostatic gauze products are
useful and/or safe. We cannot assure you that our hemostatic gauze products will ultimately achieve or
maintain signiﬁcant market acceptance among distributors, patients, physicians, or healthcare payers in
general.
 
We are dependent upon strategic relationships and distribution agreements to conduct our
operations.
 
To market and sell our hemostatic gauze products business, we will endeavor to use the business
relationships of our management to enter into strategic relationships, which may take the form of joint
ventures with private parties and contractual arrangements with other resource companies. We may not be
able to establish these strategic relationships, or if established, we may not be able to maintain them. In
addition, the dynamics of our relationships with strategic partners may require us to incur expenses or
undertake activities we would not otherwise be inclined to in order to fulﬁll our obligations to these
partners or maintain our relationships. If our strategic relationships are not established or maintained, our
business prospects may be limited, which could diminish our ability to conduct our operations. To date, we
have entered into distribution/partner agreements for the dental, veterinarian, equestrian and U.S. military
and retail markets as well as for Australasia for our hemostatic gauze products. We can provide no
assurances that additional distribution agreements will be entered into on terms satisfactory to us, if at all
or that our operations will be proﬁtable as a result of these distribution agreements.
 
We could experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
While we do not maintain our own manufacturing facilities, we have identiﬁed numerous new
facilities in the US to maintain our production. This redundancy will insure we will not have any
interruptions to our production. Our contract manufacturers and packaging facilities are responsible for
quality control and overseeing the packaging and labeling of our products for distribution. We rely upon the
services of our contract manufacturer to perform its obligations in a satisfactory manner and we could
experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
We are currently dependent on one hemostatic gauze product line to generate income.
 
The Company's hemostatic gauze product line is currently our only product line from which we can
derive revenue. Lack of success in developing a commercial market for this product line will materially
adversely aﬀect our operations.
 
Our business may suﬀer if we do not attract and retain talented personnel.
 
Our success will depend in large measure on the abilities, expertise, judgment, discretion, integrity
and good faith of our management and other personnel in conducting our intended business. In addition,
we depend on management and employees to interpret market data correctly and to interpret and respond
to economic, market and other conditions to locate and adopt appropriate business opportunities. We
presently have a small management team, which we intend to expand in conjunction with our planned
operations and growth. We will have to ensure that management and any key employees are appropriately
compensated; however, their services cannot be guaranteed. If we are unable to attract and retain
additional key management personnel and enter into satisfactory employment and other agreements, our
business may be adversely aﬀected.
 
We may not be able to adequately protect our technologies or intellectual property rights.
 
Our commercial success will depend in part on maintaining patent protection and trade secret
protection of our technologies as well as successfully defending our intellectual property against third-
party challenges. We will only be able to protect our technologies from unauthorized use by third parties to
the extent that valid and enforceable patents or trade secrets cover them. Furthermore, the degree of
future protection of our proprietary rights is uncertain because legal means aﬀord only limited protection
and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep our competitive advantage.
 
 
10
 
 
 
We have become aware of a lawsuit that has been ﬁled against the Company and our Chief
Executive Oﬃcer by a third party.
 
We have become aware that an individual who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief
Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor at various time between 2011 and 2015, has ﬁled a lawsuit
against the Company and our Chief Executive Oﬃcer in the United States District Court of the District of
Nevada claiming, among other things, that he is entitled to cash and stock compensation from 2015.
Neither the Company nor our Chief Executive Oﬃcer has been served in this action. The Company believes
that it has meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims against the claimant. If
the Company is served the summons and complaint in this matter, we plan to vigorously respond to the
claims and pursue our remedies. If this action is served upon us, due to uncertainties inherent in litigation
generally, we could not predict the outcome with certainty.
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR INDUSTRY
 
The healthcare industry is subject to extensive government regulation, which can result in
increased costs, delays, limits on its operating ﬂexibility and competitive disadvantages.
 
The healthcare industry is generally subject to extensive regulatory requirements. Many of these
requirements result in signiﬁcant costs that may adversely aﬀect our business and ﬁnancial results. If we
are unable to pass those costs on it would negatively impact our proﬁt margin.
 
Healthcare insurance legislation may lead to unintended adverse eﬀects for businesses involved in
our industry. New legislation that gives the Federal government greater regulatory powers may lead to
negative consequences for certain aspects of our business. The full scope of the recently passed
healthcare legislation may not be felt for several years, it is therefore diﬃcult to predict any future
consequences that would be challenges to our Company, or if we can overcome them.
 
Failure to comply with laws or government regulations could result in penalties.
 
Certain government requirements for technologies in the healthcare market may require licensure
or mandatory minimum standards relating to the provision of services. Failure to comply with these
requirements could materially aﬀect our ability to expand into new or existing markets. Future regulatory
developments may also cause disruptions to our operations.
 
Risks Relating to Our Organization
 
We are subject to the reporting requirements of the federal securities laws, which can be
expensive.
 
We are a public reporting company and, accordingly, subject to the information and reporting
requirements of the Exchange Act and other federal and state securities laws, including compliance with
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. The costs of preparing and ﬁling annual and quarterly reports, proxy
statements and other information with the SEC and furnishing audited reports to stockholders increase our
operating costs.
 
It is time consuming, diﬃcult and costly for us to develop and implement the internal controls and
reporting procedures required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. We may need to hire additional ﬁnancial
reporting, internal controls and other ﬁnance personnel in order to develop and implement appropriate
internal controls and reporting procedures. If we are unable to comply with the internal control’s
requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, we may not be able to obtain the independent accountant
certiﬁcations required by that Act.
 
Failure to achieve and maintain eﬀective disclosure controls or internal controls could have a
material adverse eﬀect on our ability to report our ﬁnancial results timely and accurately.
 
As result of our analysis of our system of internal accounting controls and accounting and ﬁnancial
reporting processes, we have identiﬁed a material weakness in our disclosure controls and internal
controls. These are more speciﬁcally discussed in Item 9A of this Annual Report. As a result of these
deﬁciencies, we must perform additional analysis and other post-closing procedures to ensure that our
ﬁnancial statements are prepared in accordance with US generally accepted accounting principles. As a
result, we will incur expenses and devote signiﬁcant management resources to this review process.
Furthermore, eﬀective internal controls and procedures are necessary for us to continue to provide reliable
ﬁnancial reports. If we continue to have material weaknesses in our internal controls and procedures, we
may not be able to provide reliable ﬁnancial reports and our business and operating results could be
harmed.
 
 
11
 
 
 
Public company compliance requirements may make it more diﬃcult to attract and retain
oﬃcers and directors.
 
The Sarbanes-Oxley Act and rules subsequently implemented by the SEC have required changes in
corporate governance practices of public companies. Compliance with the new rules and regulations
increases our operating costs and makes certain activities more time consuming and costly than if we
were not a public company. As a public company, these new rules and regulations make it more diﬃcult
and expensive for us to obtain director and oﬃcer liability insurance. As a result, it may be more diﬃcult
for us to attract and retain qualiﬁed persons to serve on our Board of Directors or as executive oﬃcers.
 
There exist risks to stockholders relating to dilution: authorization of additional securities and
reduction of percentage share ownership following investment.
 
To the extent that additional shares of common stock are issued, the stockholders would experience
dilution of their respective ownership interests in the Company. Additionally, if the Company issues a
substantial number of shares of common stock in connection with or following an investment, a change in
control of the Company may occur which may aﬀect, among other things, the Company's ability to utilize
net operating loss carry forwards, if any. Furthermore, the issuance of a substantial number of shares of
common stock may adversely aﬀect prevailing market prices, if any, for the common stock and could
impair the Company's ability to raise additional capital through the sale of its equity securities. The
Company may use consultants and other third parties providing goods and services or additional capital.
These consultants or third parties may be paid in cash, stock, options or other securities of the Company,
and the consultants or third parties may be Placement Agents or their aﬃliates.
 
 
 
RISKS RELATING TO OUR COMMON STOCK
 
Our stock price may be volatile.
 
The market price of our common stock is likely to be highly volatile and could ﬂuctuate widely in
price in response to various factors, many of which are beyond our control, including the following:
 
·changes in the healthcare industry;
·competitive pricing pressures;
·our ability to obtain working capital ﬁnancing;
·additions or departures of key personnel;
·limited "public ﬂoat", in the hands of a small number of persons whose sales or lack of sales,
could result in positive or negative pricing pressure on the market price for our common stock;
·our ability to execute our business plan;
·operating results that fall below expectations;
·loss of any strategic relationship;
·regulatory developments;
·economic and other external factors; and
·period-to-period ﬂuctuations in our ﬁnancial results.
 
 
12
 
 
  
In addition, the securities markets have from time to time experienced signiﬁcant price and volume
ﬂuctuations that are unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These market
ﬂuctuations may also materially and adversely aﬀect the market price of our common stock. 
 
We have not paid dividends in the past and do not expect to pay dividends in the future. Any
return on investment may be limited to the value of our common stock.
 
We have never paid cash dividends on our common stock and do not anticipate doing so in the
foreseeable future. The payment of cash dividends on our common stock will depend on earnings, ﬁnancial
condition and other business and economic factors aﬀecting us at such time as our board of directors may
consider relevant. If we do not pay dividends, our common stock may be less valuable because a return on
investment will only occur if our stock price appreciates. 
 
There is currently established market for our common stock, and we cannot ensure that one
will ever develop or be sustained.
 
The Company's common stock is available for trading on the OTC Pink. Management considers the
market for our common stock to be limited. We can provide no assurances that an established trading
market for our common stock will exist in the future.
 
Our common stock is deemed a "penny stock", which may make it more diﬃcult for our
investors to sell their shares.
 
Our common stock is subject to the "penny stock" rules adopted under Section 15(g) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The penny stock rules apply to companies whose common stock is not
listed on a national securities exchange and trades at less than $5.00 per share or that have tangible net
worth of less than $5,000,000 ($2,000,000 if the company has been operating for three or more years).
These rules require, among other things, that brokers who trade penny stock to persons other than
"established customers" complete certain documentation, make suitability inquiries of investors and
provide investors with certain information concerning trading in the security, including a risk disclosure
document and quote information under certain circumstances. Many brokers have decided not to trade
penny stocks because of the requirements of the penny stock rules and, as a result, the number of broker-
dealers willing to act as market makers in such securities is limited. If we remain subject to the penny
stock rules for any signiﬁcant period, it could have an adverse eﬀect on the market, if any, for our
securities. In as much as our securities are subject to the penny stock rules, investors will ﬁnd it more
diﬃcult to dispose of our securities. 
 
Oﬀers or availability for sale of a substantial number of shares of our common stock may
cause the price of our common stock to decline.
 
If our stockholders sell substantial amounts of our common stock in the public market, or upon the
expiration of any holding period under Rule 144, or expiration of lock-up periods applicable to outstanding
shares, or issued upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants, it could create a circumstance
commonly referred to as an "overhang" and in anticipation of which the market price of our common stock
could fall. The existence of an overhang, whether or not sales have occurred or are occurring, also could
make more diﬃcult our ability to raise additional ﬁnancing through the sale of equity or equity-related
securities in the future at a time and price that we deem reasonable or appropriate.
 
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
 
None
 
ITEM 2. DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY
 
The Company is utilizing on a temporary basis rent free, as a central mailing address as its principal
executive oﬃce, space located at 10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052. Conference
facilities are available upon request at a fee. The Company is a virtual company with personnel in Nevada
and six other states.
 
 
13
 
 
 
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
 
There are no legal proceedings pending or threatened against us, and we are unaware of any
governmental authority initiating a proceeding against us, except as follows:
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven
Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This court case was
transferred to the United States District Court in Las Vegas, Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking damages and
monies allegedly owed pursuant to an employment agreement and allegedly unpaid loans of $245,824
provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously defend
said lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company has a motion to dismiss which is
pending with the court.
 
In July 2015, the Company entered into a consulting agreement retaining the services of Maxim
Group LLC. An amended agreement was executed in January 2018. A total of 4 million shares of common
stock were issued to Maxim in exchange for its obligation to perform certain advisory and other services.
In the fourth quarter of 2018, the Company notiﬁed Maxim of its intent to ﬁle for arbitration pursuant to the
consulting agreement. Maxim, without providing a similar notice to the Company, immediately ﬁled a
complaint with FINRA seeking release of a restrictive legend from a Company stock certiﬁcate in the
amount of 500,000 shares. The Company ﬁled an aﬃrmative defense that the required notice of arbitration
was not provided to the Company prior to ﬁling. The Company also ﬁled a counterclaim for breach of
contract seeking restitution of the original 4 million shares issued to Maxim. The Company intends to
vigorously defend Maxim’s complaint and to obtain relief pursuant to its counterclaim. Currently, the
Company and Maxim have a scheduled mediation date of April 15, 2019.  If this is not successful, we will
be arbitrating our case at FINRA in September.
 
We have become aware that Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief
Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor at various time between 2011 and October 2015, has ﬁled a
lawsuit against the Company and our Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States District
Court of the District of Nevada. Neither the Company nor our Chief Executive Oﬃcer has been served in
this action as of the time this Annual Report was ﬁled. The claimant is claiming, among other things, that:
the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment Agreement with the Company,
which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid because of lack of
consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the claimant sold
Company shares issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite the fact
that all payment for the shares under the Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s 2014
Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock compensation under that
Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable,
he is entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a
third party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate
defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the
parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase
Agreement; money damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The
Company believes that it has meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims
against the claimant. If the Company is served the summons and complaint in this matter, we plan to
vigorously respond to the claims and pursue our remedies. If this action is served upon us, due to
uncertainties inherent in litigation generally, we could not predict the outcome with certainty.
 
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
 
None.
 
 
14
 
 
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES.
 
(a) Market information 
 
The common shares of the Company trade on the OTC Pink under the symbol UEEC. There has been
only limited trading activity to date. The following table sets forth the high and low sales price of the
common stock on a quarterly basis for the periods presented, rounded to the nearest penny.
 
   High  Low  
For Year Ended 2018         
First Quarter  $ 1.49  $ 0.04 
Second Quarter    1.02    0.75 
Third Quarter    0.84    0.40 
Fourth Quarter    0.69    0.30 
 
For Year Ended 2017         
First Quarter  $ 0.09  $ 0.04 
Second Quarter    0.09    0.04 
Third Quarter    0.25    0.08 
Fourth Quarter    0.75    0.15 
 
(b) Holders
 
As of December 31, 2018, there were approximately 297 holders of record of the Company’s issued
and outstanding shares of common stock.
 
(c) Dividends
 
The Company has not paid any dividends to date, has not yet generated earnings suﬃcient to pay
dividends, and currently does not intend to pay dividends in the foreseeable future. 
 
 
15
 
 
  
(d) Stock Issuances and Repurchases
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued the following unregistered
securities:
 
Date of Sale  Title of
Security Number
Sold  Consideration
Received and
Description of
Underwriting or Other
Discounts to Market
Price or Convertible
Security, Aﬀorded to
Purchasers  Exemption
from
Registration
Claimed If Option,
Warrant or
Convertible
Security,
terms of
exercise or
conversion 
Jan – March 2018 (1)  Common
Stock 4,053,225
shares $368,100 in cash,
$54,500 in services
rendered, and $182,500
of notes payable and
accrued interest; no
commissions paid  Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable
 
April – June 30, 2018  Common
Stock 835,756
shares $574,100
No commissions paid  Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable
 
April – June 30, 2018  Common
Stock 800,000
shares Services rendered; No
commissions paid  Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable 
   
July – September 30, 2018 Common
Stock 264,493
shares $135,000; no
commissions paid  Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable 
   
September 30, 2018 –
December 2018  Common
Stock 870,000
shares $435,000; no
commissions paid  Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable 
 ___________
(1)Does not include 14,150,000 shares of common stock with a fair market value of $1.09 per share at the
time of issuance, issued to oﬃcers and directors and consultants for services rendered. These shares
were to be released from escrow upon a change in control of the Company. See “Item 11” regarding the
cancelation of the issuance of 12,000,000 of these 14,150,000 shares and replacing them with restricted
stock units upon a change in control of the Company.
 
During the period January 1, 2018 through December 31, 2018, there were no repurchases of the
Company's unregistered securities.
  
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 
Not applicable.
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS
OF OPERATION
 
You should read the following discussion and analysis of our ﬁnancial condition and results of
operations together with ''Selected Financial Data'' and our ﬁnancial statements and related notes
appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K. This discussion and analysis contain forward-
looking statements that involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. The actual results may diﬀer
materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking statements as a result of certain factors,
including, but not limited to, those set forth under 'Risk Factors' and elsewhere in this annual report on
Form 10-K.
 
 
 
16
 
 
  
Results of Operations
 
Year ended December 31, 2018 versus year ended December 31, 2017
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had $45,862 and $645,652 of
revenues, respectively. The decrease in revenues is due to a change in focus and a pivot of all the
Company’s energy in making our technology and product more commercially viable, by attempting to
obtain FDA class III approval for internal surgical purposes. This process requires 100% of the Company’s
resources and energy so the focus was removed from sales and marketing and full attention was focused
on the FDA process. The reason for this change is that the Company believes the greatest value to its
shareholders would come from this FDA class III approval for general surgical use. The anticipated
completion of the human trials is expected to allow the Company to foster interest from potential merger
and acquisition candidates. Also, with the Company’s focus on an acquisition partner, the Company did not
want to engage new distribution partners that may create conﬂicts with the new prospective acquisition
companies and tie their hands from a revenue or branding perspective. However, if a merger and
acquisition candidate is identiﬁed current vendor and future relationships and all pending purchase orders
will be handed to the acquiring company for its facilitation. No assurances can be given that the Company
will complete a transaction with a merger candidate on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
Total operating expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 were $2,326,731 and
$1,297,954, respectively. The increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in research
and development expenses of approximately $57,000, an increase in advertising and marketing expenses
of approximately $124,000, an increase of approximately $410,000 in consulting/professional fees, which
includes the Company issuing 850,000 shares of common stock valued at $674,500, including 800,000
shares to eight medical advisors, $447,574 in bad debt expense and an increase of approximately $35,700
in travel expenses.
 
Other income (expense) for 2018 and 2017 was ($3,628,565) and ($215,650), respectively. The
increase in other expense was due to the Company issuing a total of 3,500,000 shares of common stock to
settle notes payable balance of $172,500 and $10,000 of accrued interest. The Company recorded a
$3,632,500 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction. During 2017, the Company issued
2,500,000 shares of common stock to settle notes payable balance of $162,500 and accounts payable
balance of $31,850. The fair value of the stock issued was $379,000 and the Company recorded loss on
debt settlement of $184,650. The Company had $0 interest expense in 2018 due to paying oﬀ its notes
payable in the ﬁrst quarter of 2018 compared to $31,000 interest expense in 2017.
 
 Our net loss for the 2018 was $6,006,135 as compared to a net loss of $934,968 for the prior year.
The increase in the net loss is due to the decrease in revenues for the reasons described above and shares
issued for services of $674,500 as mentioned above along with the issuance of 3,500,000 shares of
common stock to settle $172,500 of outstanding notes payable and $10,000 of accrued interest. The
Company recorded a $3,632,500 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction. The Company also
recorded bad debt expense of $447,574 and wrote-oﬀ $60,789 of inventory during 2018 and these
transactions did not occur in 2017.
 
Financial Condition, Liquidity and Capital Resources
 
As of December 31, 2018, the Company had a negative working capital of $352,700. The Company
has not as yet attained a level of operations which allows it to meet its current overhead and may not
attain proﬁtable operations within the next few business operating cycles, nor is there any assurance that
such an operating level can ever be achieved. The report of our independent registered public accounting
ﬁrm on our 2018 and 2017 ﬁnancial statements includes an explanatory paragraph expressing substantial
doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. While the Company has funded its initial operations
with private placements, and secured loans from related parties, there can be no assurance that adequate
ﬁnancing will continue to be available to the Company and, if available, on terms that are favorable to the
Company. Our ability to continue as a going concern is also dependent on many events outside of our
direct control, including, among other things, our ability to achieve our business goals and objectives, as
well as improvement in the economic climate.
 
 
17
 
 
  
Cash Flows
 
The Company's cash on hand at December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 was $31,273 and
$189,942, respectively.
 
During ﬁscal 2018 and ﬁscal 2017, the Company had net cash used in operating activities of
$1,273,662 and $645,900, respectively. The Company had net loss of $6,006,135 oﬀset by stock issued for
services of $674,500, write oﬀ inventory of $60,789, bad debt expense of $447,574, expenses paid by an
oﬃcer of $30,000 and loss on settlement of debt of $3,632,500. The Company also had an increase in
accounts receivable of $10,614, a decrease in inventory of $19,051, a decrease in prepaids and other
current assets of $12,114, a decrease in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $71,941 and a
decrease in accrued liabilities – related party of $61,500. Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities was
$1,114,993. This was due to the Company receiving $1,415,200 in proceeds from the sale of stock and
repaying a net amount of $290,207 in related party advances and $10,000 in notes payable.
 
During 2017, the Company incurred a net loss of $934,968, and increase in accounts receivable of
$362,569, an increase in inventory of $101,566 and an increase in prepaid and other current assets of
$12,114 oﬀset by $429,000 in stock for services, $184,650 in loss on debt settlement, $20,226 in bad debt
expense and an increase in inventory of $44,941 and an increase in accrued liabilities – related party of
$86,500. Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities was $806,475. The Company received net proceeds
from related party of $90,000, net proceeds on notes payable of $32,500 and $683,975 from the sale of
common stock.
 
Oﬀ-Balance Sheet Arrangements
 
As of December 31, 2018, and 2017, we have no oﬀ-balance sheet arrangements.
 
Related Parties
 
Information concerning related party transactions is included in the ﬁnancial statements and related
notes, appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K. 
 
Critical Accounting Policies
 
Revenue Recognition
 
Eﬀective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted ASC 606 — Revenue from Contracts with
Customers. Under ASC 606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by
applying the following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance
obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each
performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is
satisﬁed.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company issues restricted stock to consultants and employees for various services. Cost for
these transactions are measured at the fair value of the consideration received or the fair value of the
equity instruments issued, whichever is more reliably measurable. The value of the common stock for non-
employees is measured at the date at which a ﬁrm commitment for performance by the counterparty to
earn the equity instruments is reached and expense is recognized during the term at which the
counterparty's performance is earned or at the date the shares are considered non-forfeitable. The
Company recognized consulting expenses and a corresponding increase to additional paid-in-capital
related to stock issued for services. Compensation for employee stock grants are recognized at the fair
market value of the shares at the date of grant and recognized at the grant date, as it is considered that
the shares issued are considered non-forfeitable at the date of grant. Stock compensation for the periods
presented were issued for past services provided, accordingly, all shares issued are fully vested, and there
is no unrecognized compensation associated with these transactions.
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
 
The ﬁnancial statements required by Item 8 can be found beginning on Page F-2 of this report.
 
 
18
 
 
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Board of Directors and
Stockholders of United Health Products, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets of United Health Products, Inc., (the Company) as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the related statements of operations, stockholders’ deﬁcit, and cash
ﬂows for each of the years in the two-year period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes
(collectively referred to as the ﬁnancial statements). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements present fairly,
in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the
results of its operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the years in the two-year period ended December 31,
2018, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
Consideration of the Company’s Ability to Continue as a Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a
going concern. As more fully described in Note 2 to the ﬁnancial statements, the Company has incurred
losses, has not generated suﬃcient revenue to cover its operating costs, and may be unable to raise
further equity in support of operations. These factors raise substantial doubt about the Company’s ability
to continue as a going concern. Management’s plans in regard to these matters are also described in Note
2 to the ﬁnancial statements. The ﬁnancial statements do not include any adjustments that might result
from the outcome of this uncertainty. If the Company is unable to obtain ﬁnancing, there could be a
material adverse eﬀect on the Company.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Company’s ﬁnancial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting
ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are
free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have, nor
were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits,
we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, but not for the
purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant
estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Haynie & Company
Salt Lake City, Utah
April 1, 2019
 
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2018
 
 
F-1
 
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Balance Sheets
 
   December
31,
2018   December
31,
2017  
ASSETS
Current Assets         
Cash and Cash Equivalents  $ 31,273  $ 189,942 
Accounts receivable    11,010    447,970 
Inventory    83,694    163,534 
Prepaid and other current assets    -    12,114 
Total current assets    125,977    813,560 
            
TOTAL ASSETS  $ 125,977  $ 813,560 
            
LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIENCY
Current Liabilities           
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 243,713  $ 325,654 
Accrued liabilities – related party    25,000    86,500 
Liability for unissued shares    201,843    211,843 
Notes payable - related parties    8,121    268,328 
Other notes payable    -    182,500 
            
Total current liabilities    478,677   1,074,825 
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES    478,677   1,074,825 
            
Commitments and Contingencies           
            
Stockholders' Deﬁciency           
            
Common Stock - $.001 par value, 300,000,000 shares authorized,
185,943,138 and 164,969,663 shares issued at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively and 171,793,138 and 164,969,663 shares outstanding at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively    185,943    164,969 
Additional Paid-In Capital   19,198,343   13,304,617 
Accumulated Deﬁcit   (19,736,986)  (13,730,851)
Total Stockholders' Deﬁciency   (352,700)  (261,265)
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIENCY  $ 125,977  $ 813,560 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-2
 
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Operations
 
   For the Years Ended
December 31,  
   2018   2017  
          
Revenues  $ 45,862  $ 645,652 
Cost of sales    96,701    67,016 
 Gross proﬁt    (50,839)   578,636 
            
Operating Costs and Expenses           
Selling, general and administrative expenses   2,249,780   1,278,018 
Research and development expenses     76,951     19,936 
            
Total Operating Expenses   2,326,731   1,297,954 
            
Loss from Operations   (2,377,570)  (719,318)
            
Other income (expenses)           
Interest Expense    -    (31,000)
Other income    3,935    - 
Loss on settlement of debt   (3,632,500)  (184,650)
Total other income (expense)   (3,628,565)  (215,650)
            
Net Loss  $(6,006,135) $(934,968)
            
Net Loss per common share:           
Basic and diluted  $ (0.04) $ (0.01)
            
Weighted average number of shares outstanding   170,056,249   156,390,830 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-3
 
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statement of Stockholders' Deﬁciency
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 
 
           
Additional       
       Common Stock     Paid-in  Accumulated      
      Shares   
 Amount     Capital  Deﬁcit  Total 
                      
Balance at December 31, 2016  153,780,156  $153,780  $11,890,131  $(12,795,883) $(751,972)
                           
Issuance of shares for notes
payable   2,500,000    2,500   232,500    -   235,000 
                           
Issuance of shares for accounts
payable    200,000    200   143,800    -   144,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for
services   1,700,000    1,700   427,300    -   429,000 
                           
Sale and issuance of common
stock   6,789,507    6,789   610,886    -   617,675 
                           
Net Loss    -    -    -    (934,968)  (934,968)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2017  164,969,663  $164,969  $13,304,617  $(13,730,851) $(261,265)
                           
Issuance of shares for notes
payable and accrued interest   3,500,000    3,500   3,811,500    -   3,815,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for
services    850,000    850   673,650    -   674,500 
                           
Sale of common Stock   2,473,475    2,474   1,422,726    -   1,425,200 
                           
Shares held in escrow   14,150,000   14,150   (14,150)   -    - 
                           
Net Loss    -    -    -   (6,006,135)  (6,006,135)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2018  185,943,138  $185,943  $19,198,343  $(19,736,986) $(352,700)
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-4
 
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Cash Flows
 
   For the Years Ended
December 31,  
   2018  2017 
          
Cash Flows from Operating Activities:         
Net Loss  $(6,006,135) $(934,968)
Adjustments to Reconcile Net Loss to Net Cash Used in Operating Activities:           
Stock for services   674,500   429,000 
       Loss on settlement of debt   3,632,500   184,650 
      Write-oﬀ of inventory    60,789    - 
      Bad debt expense   447,574   20,226 
      Expenses paid by oﬃcer    30,000    - 
            
Changes in assets and liabilities:           
Accounts receivable   (10,614)  (362,569)
Inventory    19,051   (101,566)
Prepaid and other current assets    12,114   (12,114)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses   (71,941)  44,941 
Accrued liabilities – related party   (61,500)  86,500 
Net Cash Used In Operating Activities   (1,273,662)  (645,900)
            
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:           
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities    -    - 
            
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:           
    Repayment to related parties   (305,207)  (21,500)
Proceeds from related parties    15,000   111,500 
Repayments on notes payable   (10,000)  (77,500)
Proceeds from notes payable    -   110,000 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   1,415,200   683,975 
Net Cash Provided By Financing Activities   1,114,993   806,475 
            
Increase (decrease) in Cash and Cash Equivalents   (158,669)  160,575 
Cash and Cash Equivalents - Beginning of period   189,942   29,367 
            
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS - END OF PERIOD  $ 31,273  $189,942 
            
Supplemental cash ﬂow information:           
Cash paid for interest  $ -  $16,000 
Cash paid for income taxes  $ -  $ - 
            
Schedule of Non-Cash Financing Activities:           
Issuance of stock for accounts payable  $ -  $144,000 
Shares issued and held in escrow  $ 14,150  $ - 
Reclass of common stock and additional paid-in capital to liability for
unissued shares  $ -  $66,300 
Reclass of common stock from liability for unissued shares  $ 10,000  $ - 
Accounts payable converted to note payable  $ -  $162,500 
Common stock issued for settlement of debt and accrued interest  $182,500  $235,000 
  
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-5
 
 
  
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANY
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018 AND 2017
 
Note 1. Organization and Basis of Preparation
 
United Health Products, Inc. ("United" or the "Company") is a product development and solutions
company focusing its growth initiatives on the expanding wound-care industry and disposable medical
supplies markets. The Company produces an innovative gauze product that absorbs exudate (ﬂuids which
have been discharged from blood vessels) by forming a gel-like substance upon contact.
   
Note 2. Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will
continue as a going concern. The Company has incurred recurring net losses, negative working capital and
operations have not provided cash ﬂows. Additionally, the Company does not currently have suﬃcient
revenue producing operations to cover its operating expenses and meet its current obligations. In view of
these matters, there is substantial doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. The
Company intends on ﬁnancing its future development activities and its working capital needs largely from
the sale of public equity securities with some additional funding from other traditional ﬁnancing sources,
including term notes until such time that funds provided by operations are suﬃcient to fund working
capital requirements. The ﬁnancial statements of the Company do not include any adjustments relating to
the recoverability and classiﬁcation of recorded assets, or the amounts and classiﬁcations of liabilities that
might be necessary should the Company be unable to continue as a going concern.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer has agreed to advance funds or make payments of the Company's
obligations at his discretion. There is no written agreement to continue this support.
 
Use of Estimates
 
The preparation of ﬁnancial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles
requires the Company's management to make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported
amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of the ﬁnancial statements and the reported amounts of
income and expenses during the reported period. Changes in the economic environment, ﬁnancial markets,
as well as in the healthcare industry, and any other parameters used in determining these estimates, could
cause actual results to diﬀer.
 
 Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
The Company considers all highly liquid debt investments purchased with a maturity of three
months or less to be cash equivalents.
 
 
F-6
 
 
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
Accounting principles generally accepted in the United States deﬁne fair value as the exchange
price that would be received for an asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or
most advantageous market for the asset or liability in an orderly transaction between market participants
at the measurement date. Additionally, the inputs used to measure fair value are prioritized based on a
three-level hierarchy. This hierarchy requires entities to maximize the use of observable inputs and
minimize the use of unobservable inputs. The three levels of inputs used to measure fair value are as
follows:
 
Level 1 — Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities. 
 
Level 2 — Observable inputs other than quoted prices included in Level 1. We value assets and
liabilities included in this level using dealer and broker quotations, bid prices, quoted prices for similar
assets and liabilities in active markets, or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by
observable market data.
 
Level 3 — Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no market activity and that are
signiﬁcant to the fair value of the assets or liabilities. This includes certain pricing models, discounted cash
ﬂow methodologies and similar techniques that use signiﬁcant unobservable inputs.
 
Fair value estimates discussed herein are based upon certain market assumptions and pertinent
information available to management as of December 31, 2018 and 2017. The respective carrying value of
certain on-balance-sheet ﬁnancial instruments approximated their fair values due to the short-term nature
of these instruments.
 
Income Taxes
 
The Company accounts for income taxes using a method that requires recognition of deferred tax
assets and liabilities for expected future tax consequences of temporary diﬀerences that currently exist
between tax bases and ﬁnancial reporting bases of the Company's assets and liabilities which is
commonly known as the asset and liability method. In assessing the ability to realize deferred tax assets,
the Company considers whether it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax
assets will not be realized.
 
The Company evaluates its tax positions taken or expected to be taken in the course of preparing
the Company's tax returns to determine whether the tax positions are ''more-likely-than-not'' of being
sustained by the applicable tax authority. Tax positions not deemed to meet the "more-likely-than-not"
threshold are recorded as an expense in the applicable year. The Company does not have a liability for any
unrecognized tax beneﬁts. Management's evaluation of uncertain tax positions may be subject to review
and adjustment at a later date based upon factors including, but not limited to, an on-going analysis of tax
laws, regulations and interpretations thereof, with due consideration given to the fact that tax periods are
open to examination by tax authorities. The Company is no longer subject to U.S federal or state income
tax examinations by tax authorities before 2015. 
 
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company has approximately $14.5 and $12.1 million of net
operating loss carry-forwards, respectively, available to aﬀect future taxable income and has established a
valuation allowance equal to the tax beneﬁt of the net operating loss carry forwards and temporary
diﬀerences as realization of the asset is not assured.
 
Trade Accounts Receivable and Concentration Risk
 
We record accounts receivable at the invoiced amount and we do not charge interest. We review the
accounts receivable by amounts due from customers which are past due, to identify speciﬁc customers
with known disputes or collectability issues. In determining the amount of the reserve, we make
judgments about the creditworthiness of signiﬁcant customers based on ongoing credit evaluations. We
will also maintain a sales allowance to reserve for potential credits issued to customers. We will determine
the amount of the reserve based on historical credits issued.
 
There was no provision for doubtful accounts recorded at December 31, 2018 and 2017. The
Company recorded $447,574 and $20,226 in bad debt expense for the years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017.
 
 
F-7
 
 
 
For the year ended December 31, 2018, three customers made up 98.9% of the Company’s
outstanding accounts receivable balance. For the year ended December 31, 2018 four customers accounted
for 91.5% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2017, one customer made up 99.9% of the Company’s outstanding
accounts receivable balance. For the year ended December 31, 2017 one customer accounted for 93.2% of
the Company’s net revenue.
 
Inventory
 
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or market using the ﬁrst-in, ﬁrst-out (FIFO) method.
Inventory on the balance sheet consists of raw materials purchased by the Company and ﬁnished goods.
 
   December
31,
2018  December
31,
2017 
Raw materials  $46,121  $34,270 
Finished goods   37,573   129,264 
   $83,694  $163,534 
  
During the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company determined $60,789 and $0,
respectively, of inventory should be impaired and written-oﬀ to cost of goods sold.
 
Advertising and Marketing Costs
 
Advertising and marketing costs are expensed as incurred. The Company incurred $176,999 and
$53,050 in advertising and marketing costs during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
 
Shipping and Handling Costs
 
The Company includes shipping and handling cost as part of cost of goods sold.
 
Research and Development 
 
The Company charges research and development costs to expense when incurred. The Company
incurred $76,951 and $19,936 in research and development expenses during the years ended December
31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company issues restricted stock to consultants and employees for various services. Cost for
these transactions are measured at the fair value of the consideration received or the fair value of the
equity instruments issued, whichever is more reliably measurable. The value of the common stock for non-
employees is measured at the date at which a ﬁrm commitment for performance by the counterparty to
earn the equity instruments is reached and expense is recognized during the term at which the
counterparty's performance is earned or at the date the shares are considered non-forfeitable. The
Company recognized consulting expenses and a corresponding increase to additional paid-in-capital
related to stock issued for services. Compensation for employee stock grants are recognized at the fair
market value of the shares at the date of grant and recognized at the grant date, as it is considered that
the shares issued are considered non-forfeitable at the date of grant. Stock compensation for the periods
presented were issued for past services provided, accordingly, all shares issued are fully vested, and there
is no unrecognized compensation associated with these transactions.
 
In January 2018, the Company issued 14,150,000 shares of common stock and placed them in
escrow during the period. The shares are to be issued to various individuals upon change of control of the
Company. The Company is unable to estimate when a change of control may occur and has not recorded
any expenses related to these shares. The shares were valued at their fair market value of $1.09 per share
totaling $15,423,500 on the then date of issuance.
 
 
F-8
 
 
 
Per Share Information
 
Basic earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common shares
outstanding for the period presented. Diluted earnings per share is computed using the weighted-average
number of common shares and, if dilutive, potential common shares outstanding during the period.
Potential common shares consist of the shares of common stock held in escrow. The dilutive eﬀect of
potential common shares is not reﬂected in diluted earnings per share because the Company incurred a net
loss for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the eﬀect of including these potential common
shares in the net loss per share calculations would be anti-dilutive.
 
The total potential common shares as of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 include
14,150,000 and 0, respectively, of common stock held in escrow until a change of control in the Company
occurs.
 
New Accounting Pronouncements, Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
 
Revenue Recognition
 
Eﬀective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted ASC 606 — Revenue from Contracts with
Customers. Under ASC 606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by
applying the following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance
obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each
performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is
satisﬁed.
 
The standard became eﬀective for the Company beginning January 1, 2018 and permits two
methods of adoption: the full retrospective method, which requires the standard to be applied to each prior
period presented, or the modiﬁed retrospective method, which requires the cumulative eﬀect of adoption
to be recognized as an adjustment to opening retained earnings in the period of adoption. The Company
adopted the standard using the modiﬁed retrospective method. There was no eﬀect for any adjustments to
retained earnings upon adoption of the standard on January 1, 2018.
  
Leases
 
 In February 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update (ASU) No. ASU 2016-02, Leases,
which amends existing lease accounting guidance, including the requirement to recognize most lease
arrangements on the balance sheet. The adoption of this standard will result in the Company recognizing a
right-of-use asset representing its rights to use the underlying asset for the lease term with an oﬀsetting
lease liability. ASU 2016-02 will be eﬀective for ﬁscal years beginning after December 15, 2018, with early
adoption permitted. The Company is currently evaluating the potential impact of the adoption of this
accounting pronouncement to its ﬁnancial statements.
 
The Company considers all new pronouncements and management has determined that there have
been no other recently adopted or issued accounting standards that had or will have a material impact on
its ﬁnancial statements. 
 
Reclassiﬁcation of Prior Year Presentation
 
Certain prior year amounts have been reclassiﬁed for consistency with the current period
presentation. These reclassiﬁcations had no eﬀect on the reported results of operations.
 
Note 3. Related Party Transactions
 
As of December 31, 2018, and 2017, notes payable to related parties totaled $8,121 and $268,328,
respectively. These amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer. During the year ended
December 31, 2018, Mr. Beplate gave a personal vehicle to an employee of the Company valued at
$30,000 in lieu of the Company paying travel expenses and consulting expenses. During 2018, the
Company repaid a net amount of $305,207 of the outstanding notes payable balance. During the year
ended December 31, 2017, Mr. Beplate provided loans to the Company of $111,500. These loans were for
operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and have no interest rate.
 
Per Mr. Beplate’s services agreement, he receives monthly compensation of $15,000 per month.
During the year ended December 31, 2017, he received $93,500 of compensation and the remaining
balance of $86,500 was recorded as accrued liabilities – related party on the balance sheet. During the
year ended December 31, 2018, he received his entire salary of $180,000 and $61,500 of the accrued
compensation was paid leaving a balance of $25,000.
 
 
F-9
 
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company issued 750,000 shares of common stock to
a director of the Company for services performed. The shares had a fair market value of $142,500.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight
who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company, 500,000 shares issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is
a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 5,000,000 shares to the Chief Operating Oﬃcer. These
shares, which had a fair market value of $1.09 per share at the date of issuance, were placed in escrow
and will be released when a change of control occurs. Management is unable to determine when a change
of control will occur and $0 has been expensed as of December 31, 2018. See “Note 9” below.
 
 The Company by board resolution approved an executive compensation stock bonus package for
Mr. Beplate such that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or other change
in control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the event that no such transaction
occurs by December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate shall receive an amount equal to 15% post issuance of the then
outstanding shares of the Company's common stock on a fully diluted basis. It is intended that the board
approved stock bonus package will be in lieu of the 5% stock bonus that Mr. Beplate is already entitled to
in the event of a sale of the Company’s assets or change in control or merger transaction per his services
agreement. See “Note 9” below.
 
Note 4. Issuances of Securities
 
Share issuances 2017
 
In 2017, the Company sold 7,694,269 shares of its common stock in a private placement oﬀering for
gross proceeds of $683,975. Exemption from registration is claimed under Rule 506 of Regulation D of the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
During 2017, the Company issued 200,000 shares of stock with a fair value of $144,000 to settle an
accounts payable balance of $31,850. The Company recorded $112,150 as loss on settlement of debt.
 
During 2017, a consultant converted $162,500 in accounts payable to a promissory note. The
consultant then converted this promissory note into 2,500,000 shares of common stock. The shares of
stock had a fair value of $235,000 and the Company recorded $72,500 as loss on settlement of debt.
 
In December 2017, the Company issued 750,000 shares of common stock to a director of the
Company and 950,000 shares of common stock to unaﬃliated individuals for services performed. The
shares had a total fair market value of $429,000.
 
Share issuances 2018
 
During 2018, the Company issued an aggregate of 20,973,475 shares of common stock. The
Company issued 800,000 shares of common stock to our medical advisors with a total fair market value of
$620,000 for services, 50,000 shares of common stock to an unaﬃliated individual with a total fair market
value of $54,500 for services, 2,403,728 shares of common stock were sold for total proceeds of
$1,415,200 and 69,747 shares of common stock were issued related to $10,000 of previously recorded
liability for unissued shares during 2017.
 
The Company issued 3,500,000 shares of common stock to convert $172,500 of notes payable and
$10,000 of accrued interest. The shares were valued at their fair market value of $1.09 which resulted in a
loss on debt settlement of $3,632,500. See “Note 7” below.
 
The Company issued 14,150,000 shares of common stock with a fair market value of $1.09 per
share were issued to oﬃcers and various consultants for services to be provided related to a change of
control of the Company and placed in escrow. The shares will be released from escrow upon the change of
control of the Company. Management is unable to determine when a change of control will occur and $0
has been expensed as of December 31, 2018. See “Note 9” below.
 
 
F-10
 
 
  
Note 5. Litigation
 
There are no legal proceedings pending or threatened against us, and we are unaware of any
governmental authority initiating a proceeding against us, except as follow:
 
During 2017, a Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New
York by Steven Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This
court case was transferred to the United States District Court in Las Vegas, Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking
damages and monies allegedly owed pursuant to an employment agreement and allegedly unpaid loans of
$245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously
defend said lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company has a motion to dismiss
which is pending with the court. No accural has been recorded related to this litigation.
 
In July 2015, the Company entered into a consulting agreement retaining the services of Maxim
Group LLC. An amended agreement was executed in January 2018. A total of 4 million shares of common
stock were issued to Maxim in exchange for its obligation to perform certain advisory and other services.
In the fourth quarter of 2018, the Company notiﬁed Maxim of its intent to ﬁle for arbitration pursuant to the
consulting agreement. Maxim, without providing a similar notice to the Company, immediately ﬁled a
complaint with FINRA seeking release of a restrictive legend from a Company stock certiﬁcate in the
amount of 500,000 shares. The Company ﬁled an aﬃrmative defense that the required notice of arbitration
was not provided to the Company prior to ﬁling. The Company also ﬁled a counterclaim for breach of
contract seeking restitution of the original 4 million shares issued to Maxim. The Company intends to
vigorously defend Maxim’s complaint and to obtain relief pursuant to its counterclaim. Currently, the
Company and Maxim have a scheduled mediation date of April 15, 2019. If this is not successful,
arbitration with FINRA will be held in September.
 
Note 6. Material Agreements and Other Matters 
 
On October 1, 2013, the Company entered into an Operating Agreement with Hemo Manufacturing
LLC. Hemo Manufacturing is to act as the exclusive supplier of manufactured products for the Company's
products. Pursuant to said agreement, 2,000,000, restricted shares of the Company's Common Stock
valued at $231,270, were issued. Under certain conditions, an additional 2,000,000 shares of the
Company's Common Stock would be issued in the event the Company is bought out by a third party. The
Company anticipates booking all sales directly to customers and making payment for goods directly to
Hemo Manufacturing. The managing member of Hemo Manufacturing will retain 100% of the proﬁts earned
by Hemo Manufacturing unless the Company is sold to a third party. In the event of such a sale, the
managing member of Hemo Manufacturing and the Company would have equal share in the gross proﬁts.
The Company’s operating agreement with Hemo Manufacturing was terminated in the ﬁrst quarter of 2017.
 
Note 7. Other Notes Payable
 
During the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company received $150,000 related to a note
payable. The note was due on demand and interest accrued at the rate of 10% per annum. During the year
ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 2,500,000 shares of common stock to settle the
outstanding balance of $150,000 and accrued interest of $10,000. The balance was $0 and $150,000 as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company received a total of $75,000 related to a
note payable. The note had a maturity date of May 15, 2017 and interest accrued at the rate of 20% per
annum. The Company paid down $42,500 of the balance during 2017 leaving a balance of $32,500 as of
December 31, 2017. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company paid $10,000 of the balance
and issued 1,000,000 shares of common stock to settle the remaining balance of $22,500. The balance was
$0 and $32,500 as of December 31, 2018.
 
The Company borrowed $35,000 in April 2017 related to a note payable, with original issue discount
of $3,500. The note was paid oﬀ in full in May 2017.
 
The Company has recognized a "Liability for unissued shares" for shares granted to employees and
consultants along with shares purchased by investors, but unissued as of the balance sheet date. The
granted shares are recorded at the fair market value of the shares to be issued at the grant date and a
corresponding current liability is recorded for these unissued shares. The activity in this account and
balances, classiﬁed as Liabilities for unissued shares, as of December 31 was as follows:
 
 
F-11
 
 
 
   2018  2017 
Balance, beginning  $211,843  $145,543 
Reclass of previous shares purchased and recorded in equity    -   66,300 
Issuance of shares in satisfaction of liability   10,000    - 
Balance, ending  $201,843  $211,843 
 
The total number of shares granted but unissued were 2,414,059 and 2,483,806, as of December 31,
2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
Note 8. Income Tax
 
The Company accounts for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB")
Accounting Standards Codiﬁcation ("ASC") No. 740, Income Taxes ("ASC 740"). Under ASC 740, deferred tax
assets and liabilities are recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to diﬀerences between
the ﬁnancial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable
income in the years in which those temporary diﬀerences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under
ASC 740, the eﬀect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in
the period that includes the enactment date.
 
On December 22, 2017, the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act) was enacted into law including
a one-time mandatory transition tax on accumulated foreign earnings and a reduction of the corporate
income tax rate to 21% eﬀective January 1, 2018, among others. We are required to recognize the eﬀect of
the tax law changes in the period of enactment, such as determining the transition tax, remeasuring our
U.S. deferred tax assets and liabilities as well as reassessing the net realizability of our deferred tax
assets and liabilities. The Company does not have any foreign earnings and therefore, we do not anticipate
the impact of a transition tax. We have remeasured our U.S. deferred tax assets at a statutory income tax
rate of 21%.
 
The Company did not take any uncertain tax positions and had no adjustments to its income tax
liabilities or beneﬁts pursuant to the provisions of Section 740-10-25 for the years ended December 31,
2018 or 2017.The Company recognizes interest accrued related to unrecognized tax beneﬁts in interest
expense and penalties in operating expenses. No such interest or penalties were recognized during the
period presented. The Company had no accruals for interest and penalties at December 31, 2018.
 
 The Company's federal income tax returns for the years ended December 31, 2015 through
December 31, 2018 remain subject to examination by the Internal Revenue Service as of December 31,
2018.
 
During 2018 and 2017, the Company incurred net losses and, therefore, has no tax liability. The net
deferred tax asset generated by the loss carry-forward has been fully reserved.
 
    December 31,  
   2018  2017 
Income tax provision (beneﬁt) at statutory rate  $(1,261,000) $(196,000)
Impact of rate changes on valuation allowance    -   1,485,200 
Change in valuation allowance   1,261,000   (1,289,000)
Income Tax Expense  $ -  $ - 
            
Net deferred tax assets and liabilities were comprised of the
following:           
Net Operating Losses  $3,070,415  $2,522,000 
Accrued oﬃcer compensation    12,915    34,800 
Other non-deductible expenses   904,470   170,000 
Valuation allowance   (3,987,800)  (2,726,800)
Deferred tax asset, net  $ -  $ - 
 
 
F-12
 
 
  
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company has taxable net loss carryovers of approximately
$14.5 million and $12.1 million, respectively. The change in the valuation allowance for the years ended
December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $369,400 and $(1,289,200), respectively. The Company reduced its
valuation allowance by approximately $1,485,200 during 2017 due to the change in tax rates to 21%.
Under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, these losses can be carried forward twenty years.
Net operating losses will expire through 2038.
 
 Note 9. Subsequent Events
 
The Company has evaluated events from December 31, 2018, through the date whereupon the
ﬁnancial statements were issued and has determined that there are no other material events that need to
be disclosed, except as follows:
 
 ·200,000 shares were issued to securities counsel for services rendered;
   
 ·100,000 shares were issued in January 2019 to each of two directors;
   
 ·50,000 shares of common stock were issued to a private placement investor at $.50 per share;
and
   
 ·2,150,000 shares of the 14,150,000 shares referenced in Note 3 became vested by the Board of
Directors, including 1,600,000 shares to the Company’s Chief Financial Oﬃcer/director, 500,000
shares to an oﬃce administrator and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the
son of the oﬃce administrator. The Company recorded an expense of $2,343,500 related to the
vesting of these shares.
 
In March 2019, the Company canceled the 12,000,000 shares issued to various oﬃcers, directors
and consultants described in Notes 3 and 4 herein and Mr. Beplate’s bonus arrangement described in Note
3 above. Contemporaneously, the Company replaced these stock bonus arrangements with Board
approved restricted stock unit agreements with its oﬃcers, directors and consultants covering an
aggregate of 50,100,000 shares of common stock to be issued and delivered to such persons upon the
earlier of (i) a change in control of the Company by a cash tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise or
(ii) the Company achieving gross revenues of $20,000,000 in gross revenues on a go forward basis, or (iii)
the commencement of an event by a third party without the Board’s approval to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a
change in control of the Company or the Company’s management.
 
The Company has become aware that Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a
director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor at various time between 2011 and October
2015, has ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the
United States District Court of the District of Nevada. Neither the Company nor our Chief Executive Oﬃcer
has been served in this action as of the time this Annual Report was ﬁled. The claimant is claiming, among
other things, that: the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment Agreement with
the Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid because of
lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the claimant sold
Company shares issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite the fact
that all payment for the shares under the Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s 2014
Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock compensation under that
Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable,
he is entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a
third party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate
defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the
parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase
Agreement; money damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The
Company believes that it has meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims
against the claimant. If the Company is served the summons and complaint in this matter, we plan to
vigorously respond to the claims and pursue our remedies. If this action is served upon us, due to
uncertainties inherent in litigation generally, we could not predict the outcome with certainty.
 
 
F-13
 
 
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
 
On March 29, 2018 (the “Resignation Date”) Pritchett, Siler and Hardy P.C. (“PSH”) resigned as the
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm for the Company due to the sale of certain of PSH’s assets.
On March 29, 2018, the Company engaged Haynie & Company, Salt Lake City, Utah, as its new
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm. The change of the Company’s independent registered public
accounting ﬁrm from PSH to Haynie & Company was approved unanimously by our board of directors.
 
During the Company’s two most recent ﬁscal years and in the subsequent interim period through
the Resignation Date, the Company has not consulted with Haynie & Company regarding either (i) the
application of accounting principles to a speciﬁed transaction, either completed or proposed, or the type of
audit opinion that might be rendered on the Company’s consolidated ﬁnancial statements, and neither a
written report nor oral advice was provided to the Company that Haynie & Company concluded was an
important factor considered by the Company in reaching a decision as to the accounting, auditing or
ﬁnancial reporting issue; or (ii) any matter that was either the subject of a disagreement (as deﬁned in
Item 304(a)(1)(iv) of Regulation S-K and the related instructions) or a reportable event (as described in
Item 304(a)(1)(v) of Regulation S-K).
 
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
 
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
 
The Company needs to implement disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(e)
and 15d-15(e) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the ''Exchange Act''), that are designed to ensure
that information required to be disclosed in the Company's Exchange Act reports are recorded, processed,
summarized, and reported within the time periods speciﬁed in the rules and forms of the Securities and
Exchange Commission, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our Chief
Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
 
As of December 31, 2018, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer carried out an
assessment, of the eﬀectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures
pursuant to Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(b) and 15d-15(b). As of the date of this assessment, the Chief
Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer concluded that the Company's disclosure controls and
procedures were not eﬀective as of December 31, 2018, because of the material weakness described
below.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer performed additional accounting and ﬁnancial
analyses and other post-closing procedures, including detailed validation work with regard to balance
sheet account balances, additional analysis on income statement amounts and managerial review of all
signiﬁcant account balances and disclosures in the Annual Report on Form 10-K, to ensure that the
Company's Annual Report and the ﬁnancial statements forming part thereof are in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Accordingly, management
believes that the ﬁnancial statements included in this Annual Report fairly present, in all material respects,
the Company's ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and cash ﬂows for the periods presented.
 
 
19
 
 
 
Management's Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting, as such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the
Exchange Act. The Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide
reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial
statements for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in
the United States of America. Internal control over ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and
procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly
reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance
that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and
(iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition,
use, or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material eﬀect on the interim or annual
ﬁnancial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or
detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to
the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer assessed the eﬀectiveness of the Company's
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2018. In performing its assessment of the
eﬀectiveness of the Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, management applied the criteria
described in the Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (''COSO - 2013'').
 
A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or a combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting, such that there is a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the
Company's annual or interim ﬁnancial statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.
 
The material weakness identiﬁed during management's assessment was the lack of corporate
documentation, inadequate reconciliation of accounts, lack of suﬃcient resources with SEC, generally
accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") and tax accounting expertise. These control deﬁciencies could
result in a material misstatement of signiﬁcant accounts or disclosures that would result in a material
misstatement to the Company's interim or annual ﬁnancial statements that would not be prevented or
detected. Accordingly, management has determined that these control deﬁciencies constitute a material
weakness.
 
Because of the material weakness, management concluded that the Company did not maintain
eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on the criteria in Internal
Control-Integrated Framework issued by COSO -2013.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There were no reported changes in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting for the year ended
December 31, 2018.
 
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
 
None. 
 
 
20
 
 
  
PART III
 
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
 
Directors and Executive Oﬃcers
 
Our directors and executive oﬃcers of the Company as of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K are as
follows:
 
Name Age Position with Company
Douglas K. Beplate 64 Chief Executive and Chairman of the Board
Louis Schiliro   48  Chief Operating Oﬃcer
Nate Knight 68 Chief Financial Oﬃcer, Secretary, Treasurer and Director
Robert Denser 48 Director
 
Our directors hold oﬃce for one-year terms and until their successors have been elected and
qualiﬁed. Our oﬃcers are elected annually by the board of directors and serve at the discretion of the
Board.
 
Douglas K. Beplate, Chief Executive Oﬃcer of the Company since November 2014 and Chief
Operating Oﬃcer of the Company since November 2013. Mr. Beplate became a director and Chairman of
the Board of the Company in 2015. Mr. Beplate has been working on the development and marketing of the
Hemostyp gauze since 2010. Mr.Beplate's present responsibilities include daily operations and oversight of
sales, marketing, product development and intellectual property. From 1996 to 2007, Mr. Beplate was
founder and President of Emergency Filtration Products, Inc. (EFP) where his responsibilities included
product design, research and development, patent work and production. During his time at EFP, Mr. Beplate
was awarded a grant through California State University San Bernardino for development of
nanotechnology for the U.S. government and military sector. Prior to his position at EFP he was a
consultant to various medical products ﬁrms from where he was involved in research and development,
and product design.
 
Louis Schiliro, Chief operating Oﬃcer ince January 2017, Mr. Schiliro has been responsible for all
day to day operations for manufacturing, packaging and marketing of Hemostyp Gauze for United Health
Products. He has also overseen all marketing, sales and manufacturing strategies. He has acted as the
coordinator and liaison for all Federal regulatory interactions including FDA processes. Previously, Mr.
Schiliro served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer of Hemo Manufacturing from January 2014 through December
2016, where he was responsible for all day to day operations for manufacturing, packaging and marketing
of Hemostyp Gauze as a contract vendor for United Health Products. He was integral in developing dozens
of new SKUs and package setups. From January 2012 through January 2014, he was a Partner at ETL
Response Inc. ETL is a company dedicated to speciﬁc projects by oﬀering clients a full cycle solution. ETL is
a manufacturer, seller and/or distributor for those clients which need some or all of these services. ETL
works in the medical device and homeland security ﬁelds. From 1997 through January 2012, Mr. Schiliro
served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer of Global Medical USA and Global Medical.
Global Protection was a market leader in distributing protective equipment to America’s First Responders.
Global Medical. was a distributor of medical supplies and products to surgery centers in New Jersey. From
1996 through 1999, he served as a Manager of International Sales/National Accounts Manager at SAFECO,
where he was responsible for creating distribution channels in international markets for safety and medical
supplies. He has a Masters of Business in International Finance/Economics – George Mason University
(1995) and he graduated with Bachelors of Arts in International Relations/Economics – West Virginia
University (1993).
 
Nate Knight, a director of the Company since December 2012 and Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the
Company since 2013, brings to the Company years of business experience and knowledge of the
Company's HemoStyp product. Mr. Knight was a principal in Med Spring, Inc., the Company that originally
developed the HemoStyp gauze products prior to the Company's acquisition of the rights to same. Mr.
Knight has been a public accountant for over 30 years and has owned and operated his own accounting
business. Mr. Knight previously held a Series 7 license and since February 2012, he has been employed by
an internal auditor with Prime Alliance Bank. Between 2004 and 2010, Mr. Knight served as Chief Financial
Oﬃcer of MedSpring Group Inc., a privately-owned medical device company. Mr. Knight with his extensive
accounting experience and knowledge of the Company's HemoStyp product line as well as its potential
applications, makes him an ideal candidate to continue to serve on our Board of Directors as an
independent director.
 
 
21
 
 
 
Robert J. Denser, a director of the Company since November 2014. Mr. Denser graduated from the
University of California, Santa Barbara in 1993 with a BA degree in Business Economics. Over the past 10
years his main focus has been to assist federal and state agencies, ﬁrst responders, EMS agencies and
hospitals with their planning and procurement of the necessary medical equipment needed to be
adequately prepared for any type of natural or man-made disaster. This includes working with the Medical
Directors and their teams from the State of California and Los Angeles County with the development and
fulﬁllment of a $60 million project that will give hospitals the caches of medical equipment needed to
properly respond to the surge of patients that will result from a disaster. For the past ﬁve years Mr. Denser
has been a member of ETL Response, LLC and has been in the role of Director of Sales and Finance. In this
role he coordinates all ETL projects as needed. ETL Response. Mr. Denser's background experience also
includes direct access to key decision makers within the VA hospital system, as well as federal and private
disaster response agencies, like FEMA and the Red Cross, that are on the front lines of any disaster.
Management believes that the foregoing experience of Mr. Denser makes him an ideal candidate to
continue to serve on our Board of Director as an independent director.
 
Directors' and Oﬃcers' Liability Insurance
 
We are currently looking to obtain directors' and oﬃcers' liability insurance insuring our directors
and oﬃcers against liability for acts or omissions in their capacities as directors or oﬃcers, subject to
certain exclusions. Such insurance also would insure us against losses which we may incur in indemnifying
our oﬃcers and directors. In addition, we may enter into indemniﬁcation agreements with key oﬃcers and
directors and such persons shall also have indemniﬁcation rights under applicable laws, and our certiﬁcate
of incorporation and bylaws.
 
Corporate Governance
 
Our business, property and aﬀairs are managed by, or under the direction of, our Board, in
accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Nevada and our By-Laws. Members of the
Board are kept informed of our business through discussions with the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and other key
members of management, by reviewing materials provided to them by management.
 
We continue to review our corporate governance policies and practices by comparing our policies
and practices with those suggested by various groups or authorities active in evaluating or setting best
practices for corporate governance of public companies. Based on this review, we have adopted, and will
continue to adopt, changes that the Board believes are the appropriate corporate governance policies and
practices for our Company. We have adopted changes and will continue to adopt changes, as appropriate,
to comply with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and subsequent rule changes made by the SEC and any
applicable securities exchange.
 
Director Qualiﬁcations and Diversity
 
The board seeks independent directors who represent a diversity of backgrounds and experiences
that will enhance the quality of the board's deliberations and decisions. Candidates shall have substantial
experience with one or more publicly traded companies or shall have achieved a high level of distinction in
their chosen ﬁelds. The board is particularly interested in maintaining a mix that includes individuals who
are active or retired executive oﬃcers and senior executives, particularly those with experience in the
ﬁnance and capital market industries.
 
In evaluating nominations to the Board of Directors, our Board also looks for certain personal
attributes, such as integrity, ability and willingness to apply sound and independent business judgment,
comprehensive understanding of a director's role in corporate governance, availability for meetings and
consultation on Company matters, and the willingness to assume and carry out ﬁduciary responsibilities.
Qualiﬁed candidates for membership on the Board will be considered without regard to race, color, religion,
sex, ancestry, national origin or disability.
 
 
22
 
 
  
Risk Oversight
 
Enterprise risks are identiﬁed and prioritized by management and each prioritized risk is assigned to
the full board for oversight. These risks include, without limitation, the following: 
 
Risks and exposures associated with strategic, ﬁnancial and execution risks and other current
matters that may present material risk to our operations, plans, prospects or reputation.
 
Risks and exposures associated with ﬁnancial matters, particularly ﬁnancial reporting, tax,
accounting, disclosure, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, ﬁnancial policies, investment guidelines
and credit and liquidity matters.
 
Risks and exposures relating to corporate governance; and management and director succession
planning. 
 
Risks and exposures associated with leadership assessment, and compensation programs and
arrangements, including incentive plans. 
 
Board Leadership Structure
 
In accordance with the Company's By-Laws, the Chairman of the Board presides at all meetings of
the Board. Mr. Beplate currently holds both the position of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive
Oﬃcer. The Company has no ﬁxed policy with respect to the separation of the oﬃces of the Chairman of
the Board and Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
Code of Ethics
 
We have adopted a Code of Ethics within the meaning of Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K of the
Exchange Act. This Code of Ethics applies to our directors and senior oﬃcers, such as the principal
executive oﬃcer, principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer and persons performing similar functions. Our Code of Ethics is
available as Exhibit 14 to our Annual Report on Form 10-K ﬁled April 16, 2010.
 
Committees
 
As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the Board of Directors has no committees. Robert Denser
may be deemed an independent director of the Company as that term is deﬁned under the Exchange Act of
1934, as amended. Mr. Denser is not deemed to be a ﬁnancial expert. The term "Financial Expert" is
deﬁned under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, as a person who has the following attributes:
an understanding of generally accepted accounting principles and ﬁnancial statements; has the ability to
assess the general application of such principles in connection with the accounting for estimates, accruals
and reserves; experience preparing, auditing, analyzing or evaluating ﬁnancial statements that present a
breadth and level of complexity of accounting issues that are generally comparable to the breadth and
complexity of issues that can reasonably be expected to be raised by the company's ﬁnancial statements,
or experience actively supervising one or more persons engaged in such activities; an understanding of
internal controls and procedures for ﬁnancial reporting; and an understanding of audit committee functions.
 
Section 16(a) Beneﬁcial Ownership Reporting Compliance
 
Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 requires our oﬃcers and directors, and persons
who own more than ten percent of a registered class of our equity securities, to ﬁle reports of ownership
and changes in ownership with the SEC. These persons are required by regulation to furnish us with copies
of all Section 16(a) reports that they ﬁle. Mr. Beplate intends to ﬁle one or more delinquent form 4 ﬁlings
for 2018.
 
Communications with the Board of Directors
 
Stockholders may communicate with the Board of Directors by sending a letter to United Health
Products, Inc. Board of Directors, c/o our securities counsel, Morse & Morse, PLLC, 1400 Old Country Road,
Suite 302, Westbury, NY 11590. Our securities counsel will receive the correspondence and forward it to the
Chairman or to any individual director or directors to whom the communication is directed, unless the
communication is unduly hostile, threatening, and illegal, does not reasonably relate to the Company or its
business, or is similarly inappropriate. The Chairman of the Board has the authority to discard or disregard
any inappropriate communications or to take other appropriate actions with respect to any such
inappropriate communications.
 
 
23
 
 
 
Advisory Board
 
The Company has formed an Advisory Board consisting of the following persons:
 
Gerard Abate, MD Former Executive Director, Medical Aﬀairs for Fortune 500 company Quest
Diagnostics, where he directed 80+ Medical Aﬀairs group that includes 8 clinical franchise medical
directors, (oncology, genetics, women’s health, cardiovascular-metabolism, neurology, infectious
disease/inﬂammation), HEOR team, publications group, MSLs, genetic counselors and project management.
 
Joseph M. Chalil, MD, MBA, FACHE, Chairman of the Global Clinical Trial Network of American
Association of Physicians of Indian Origin (AAPI), the second largest physician organization in the US
second only to AMA. He serves on the Healthcare Advisory Board and currently an Adjunct Professor at
Nova Southeastern University. Dr. Chalil has over 15 years of Pharmaceutical and Biotechnology
management experience. Formerly, a Physician Executive at Boehringer Ingelheim and a veteran of the
U.S. Navy Medical Corps, Dr. Chalil is also board certiﬁed in healthcare management, and has been
awarded Fellowship by the American College of Healthcare Executives.
 
Michael Erik Jessen MD Professor and Chairman, and Frank M. Ryburn, Jr. Distinguished Chair in
Cardiothoracic Surgery and Transplantation, Department of Cardiovascular and Thoracic Surgery, University
of Texas Southwestern Medical Center.
 
Richard Massoth, DDS, MSD received his specialty training in Endodontics and his Master of Science in
Dentistry from Boston University in 1982. He has been an Adjunct Professor at the UCLA School of
Dentistry and has been in clinical practice for 36 years. Dr. Massoth has been a published author and a
symposium speaker on “Endodontic Microsurgery” and “The Use of Cone Beam CT Scans in Endodontic
Diagnosis.”
 
David W. Ramey DVM Thirty-four years of clinical experience as a full-time veterinarian, specializing in
the care of performance and pleasure horses: thirteen books, ﬁve book chapters, and over seventy papers
published in professional journals. Frequent speaker on various veterinary topics at universities,
conventions, and continuing education seminars around the United States, as well as Canada, Australia,
and the UK.
 
Zachariah P. Zachariah, MD Medical Director, UHealth Cardiology Fort Lauderdale. Clinical Faculty,
Department of Cardiology, University of Miami. Board member Florida Board of Governors. Member Board
of Trustees, Chairman, Technology Transfer Committee Member- Executive Committee. Member, Academic
Aﬀairs & Strategic Planning Committee, Nova Southeastern University.
 
Lawrence A Wolﬀ, DDS received his Doctor of Dental Surgery degree from the medical College of
Virginia. After completing his program at the Richmond, Virginia VA Hospital he returned to Los Angeles,
CA where he started his practice in the San Fernando Valley. Dr Wolﬀ taught at USC for ten years and then
moved his practice to Providence St. Joseph’s Hospital. Dr Wolﬀ is Chairman of the Dental/Oral Maxillo-
Facial Surgery Section in the Department of Surgery at Providence St Joseph. In addition, he is a Fellow of
the Academy of General Dentistry (FAGD).
 
Clay W. Robinson, DVM has been Chief Medical Oﬃcer of Frontier BioMedical, LLC since August 1998. Dr.
Robinson's Professional career includes, Head of Frontier BioMedical, Inc. IACUC since 2001; Holds Private
Mixed Practice and self-employed since August 1998; a resident Veterinarian at Utah State University from
September 1995 to August 1998; Private Equine Practice, Kayscreek Equine Clinic, Layton, Utah, from
February 1994 to August 1995; Private Mixed Practice, Animal Health Center, LaGrande, Oregon, from June
1992 to February 1994. Dr. Robinson Research includes, Protocol development and surgical implementation
of new devices and techniques with Frontier BioMedical, Inc., since August 1998. Surgical Harvesting of
Equine ovaries and in vitro transfer of EVA (Equine Viral Arteritis) in the unfertilized oocyte. Utah State
University, Published. In vitro clearance of EVA from equine semen, Utah State University, Unpublished. He
also Participated in all animal research under the Ag Experiment Station at Utah State University from
September 1995 to August 1998. He served as a Member of Frontier BioMedical, Inc. IACUC from 1997 to
2001. His Education details includes Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon, May 1992 and Washington
State University; Pullman, Washington June 1992 Doctor of Veterinary Medicine; Southern Utah University,
Cedar City, Utah June 1987; Bachelor of Science, Major: Biology with an agricultural emphasis.
  
As the Company continues to pursue its application to have HemoStyp approved for clinical use in
the United States and abroad, it looks forward to calling upon these experts in the ﬁelds of medicine,
veterinary medicine and dental medicine to pursue various opportunities in these diﬀerent markets.
 
                In lieu of cash compensation, each medical advisor received 100,000 shares of restricted
common stock as compensation for his services to the Company.
 
 
24
 
 
 
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth the overall compensation earned over the ﬁscal years ended
December 31, 2018 and 2017 by (1) each person who served as the principal executive oﬃcer of the
Company or its subsidiary during ﬁscal year 2018; (2) our most highly compensated (up to a maximum of
two) executive oﬃcers as of December 31, 2018 with compensation during ﬁscal year ended 2018 of
$100,000 or more; and (3) those two individuals, if any, who would have otherwise been in included in
section (2) above but for the fact that they were not serving as an executive of us as of December 31,
2018.
 
   Fiscal
Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($)  Stock
Awards
($)  Options
Awards
($)(1)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)   Non-qualiﬁed
Deferred
Compensation
Earnings ($)  All Other
Compensation
($)(2)(3)  Total
($)
                                    
Douglas
Beplate 2018 $180,000  $-0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $180,000
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer 2017 $180,000  $-0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $180,000
                                            
Louis
Schiliro 2018 $150,000  $-0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $150,000
Chief
Operating
Oﬃcer 2017 $150,000  $-0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $150,000
_____________ 
(1)FASB ASC Topic 718 requires the company to determine the overall full grant date fair value of the
restricted stock awards and options as of the date of grant based upon the Black-Scholes method of
valuation which total amounts are set forth in the table above under the year of grant, and to then
expense that value over the service period over which the restricted stock awards and options become
vested. As a general rule, for time-in-service-based restricted stock awards and options, the company
will immediately expense any restricted stock awards and option or portion thereof which is vested
upon grant, while expensing the balance on a pro rata basis over the remaining vesting term of the
restricted stock awards and options. For a description FASB ASC Topic 718 and the assumptions used in
determining the value of the restricted stock awards and options under the Black-Scholes model of
valuation, see the notes to the ﬁnancial statements included with this Form 10 K.
 
(2)Includes all other compensation not reported in the preceding columns, including (i) perquisites and
other personal beneﬁts, or property, unless the aggregate amount of such compensation is less than
$10,000; (ii) any "gross-ups" or other amounts reimbursed during the ﬁscal year for the payment of
taxes; (iii) discounts from market price with respect to securities purchased from the company except
to the extent available generally to all security holders or to all salaried employees; (iv) any amounts
paid or accrued in connection with any termination (including without limitation through retirement,
resignation, severance or constructive termination, including change of responsibilities) or change in
control; (v) contributions to vested and unvested deﬁned contribution plans; (vi) any insurance
premiums paid by, or on behalf of, the company relating to life insurance for the beneﬁt of the named
executive oﬃcer; and (vii) any dividends or other earnings paid on stock or option awards that are not
factored into the grant date fair value required to be reported in a preceding column.
 
(3) Includes compensation for service as a director described under Director Compensation, below.
 
For a description of the material terms of each named executive oﬃcers' compensation
arrangements, including the terms of any contract, agreement, plan or other arrangement that provides for
any payment to a named executive oﬃcer in connection with his or her resignation, retirement or other
termination, or a change in control of the company see section below entitled "Compensation
Arrangements."
 
No outstanding common share purchase option or other equity-based award granted to or held by
any named executive oﬃcer were repriced or otherwise materially modiﬁed, including extension of
exercise periods, the change of vesting or forfeiture conditions, the change or elimination of applicable
performance criteria, or the change of the bases upon which returns are determined, nor was there any
waiver or modiﬁcation of any speciﬁed performance target, goal or condition to payout.
 
 
25
 
 
  
Compensation Agreements – Douglas Beplate and Louis Schiliro
 
In January 2015, the Company entered into a services agreement with Douglas Beplate with a
monthly compensation of $8,333, which was later increased to $15,000. Mr. Beplate is entitled to an annual
restricted stock bonus equal to 2 ½% of gross sales with the number of shares computed based upon the
average closing sales price of the Company's common stock in the month of December of each year. No
stock bonus related to gross sales was accrued for 2016, 2017 or 2018 as such stock bonuses were
immaterial and were waived by Mr. Beplate.
 
On April 16, 2018, the Company by board resolution approved an executive compensation stock
bonus package for Mr. Beplate such that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the
Company or other change in control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the
event that no such transaction occurs by December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate shall receive an amount equal to
15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of the Company's common stock on a fully diluted basis.
It is intended that the board approved stock bonus package will be in lieu of the 5% stock bonus that Mr.
Beplate is already entitled to in the event of a sale of the Company’s assets or change in control or merger
transaction per his services agreement.
 
Mr. Schiliro is being compensated at the monthly rate of $12,500 pursuant to a services agreement.
 
Both of Messers Beplate and Schiliro agreements provide for stock bonuses in the event of a change
in control, which arrangements were amended by the stock bonus arrangements described below.
 
 Services Agreements of Other Executive Oﬃcers and the Spouse of our CEO
 
In November 2014, the Company entered into Services agreement with Nate Knight, our Chief
Financial Oﬃcer. His employment agreement is terminable by the Company "at will." Mr. Knight receives
cash compensation of $4,000 per month, which has been increased to $5,000 per month. He also received
100,000 shares in January 2019 for services rendered as a director.
 
The spouse of our Chief Executive Oﬃcer entered into an employment agreement for her services in
November 2014 as an oﬃce administrator and she receives as an employee "at will" 500,000 shares as a
signing bonus and a monthly salary of $4,000, which has been increased to $5,000 per month.
 
Stock Bonuses
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight
who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company, 500,000 shares issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is
a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 50,000 shares to the Technical Product Supervisor who is
the son of the oﬃce administrator. These shares, which had a fair market value of $1.09 per share at the
date of issuance, were placed in escrow and were scheduled to be released when a change of control
occurs. Eﬀective April 1, 2019, the Board of Directors vested the aforementioned shares as earned by the
respective three individuals.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued Louis Schiliro 5,000,000 shares and
an additional 7,000,000 shares to two non-aﬃliated individuals. The 12,000,000 shares in the aggregate
were escrowed and were to vest only upon a change in control of the Company. These shares were valued
at $1.09 per share. In March 2019, these 12,000,000 shares were canceled and replaced with the restrictive
stock unit awards described in the next paragraph.
 
In March 2019, restricted stock unit awards were granted to Douglas Beplate (33,000,000 shares),
Louis Schiliro (8,000,000 shares), four non-aﬃliated persons (8,550,000 shares), Wendy Harper, our oﬃce
administrator shares (250,000 shares) and our Technical Product Supervisor and Internet Commerce
Supervisor, these two supervisors are Ms. Harper’s children and received an aggregate of 300,000 shares.
These restricted stock unit awards vest upon the earlier of (i) a change in control of the Company by a cash
tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise, or (ii) the Company achieving $20,000,000 in gross revenues
on a go forward basis, or (iii) the commencement of an event by a third party without the Board’s approval
to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a change in control of the Company or the Company’s management in
accordance with the terms of the restricted stock unit awards ﬁled as an Exhibit in this 10-K. This
compensation arrangement was also in lieu of Mr. Beplate’s bonus arrangement described herein.
 
 
26
 
 
 
Executive Oﬃcer Outstanding Equity Awards at Fiscal Year-End
 
As of the ﬁling date of this form 10-K, the Company has no outstanding Common Stock Options, and
none were issued in the year ended December 31, 2018 or 2017 to executive oﬃcers or directors of the
Company.
 
Review of Risks Arising from Compensation Policies and Practices
 
We have reviewed our compensation policies and practices for all employees and concluded that
any risks arising from our policies and practices are not reasonably likely to have a material adverse eﬀect
on the Company.
 
DIRECTOR COMPENSATION
 
Cash Fees and Options
 
Currently the Company has no audit, compensation, corporate governance, nominating or other
committee of the Board of Directors, although it intends to establish an audit, compensation and corporate
governance committee in the near future. No cash fees have been paid to board members for serving on
the board. The Company has rewarded its directors with restricted shares and/or options.
 
During ﬁscal 2018, the Company did not grant any of its directors’ cash, securities or other
remuneration for serving on the Board. In the ﬁrst quarter of 2019, each director other than Mr. Beplate
received 100,000 shares of common stock.
 
Travel Expenses
 
All directors shall be reimbursed for their reasonable out of pocket expenses associated with
attending the meeting.
 
2013 Stock Option Plan
 
On August 8, 2013, the Board of Directors approved the 2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting
Services Compensation Plan which has 15,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. The Plan
provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock under the Plan and for the grant of non-
statutory stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof. While the
Plan provides for incentive stock options, no incentive stock options may be granted under the Plan since
no stockholder approval was obtained on or before August 8, 2014. In September 2013, the Company
issued 6,000,000 shares of stock under said Plan to Douglas Beplate pursuant to his then consulting
contract. The Company has not granted any options under the Plan since its approval.
 
 
27
 
 
 
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
 
As of April 1, 2019, the Company had outstanding 174,493,138 shares of Common Stock. The only
persons of record who presently hold or are known to own (or believed by the Company to own)
beneﬁcially more than 5% of the outstanding shares of such class of stock is listed below. The following
table also sets forth certain information as to holdings of the Company's Common Stock of all oﬃcers and
directors individually, and all oﬃcers and directors as a group.
 
Name and Address of Beneﬁcial Owner (1)
Oﬃcers and Directors:  Number
of
Common
Shares  Percentage 
Nate Knight   2,100,000    1.2%
Douglas K. Beplate (2)   2,504,047    1.4%
Robert Denser   1,350,000   * 
Louis Schiliro (3)    0    0%
All directors and oﬃcers as a group (four persons)   5,954,047    3.4%
___________  
*Represents less than 1%
(1)
 
 Beneﬁcial ownership is determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, and is generally determined by voting powers and/or investment powers with
respect to securities. Unless otherwise noted, all of such shares of common stock listed above are
owned of record by each individual named as beneﬁcial owner and such individual has sole voting and
dispositive power with respect to the shares of common stock owned by each of them. Such person or
entity's percentage of ownership is determined by assuming that any options or convertible securities
held by such person or entity, which are exercisable within sixty (60) days from the date hereof, have
been exercised or converted as the case may be, but not for the purposes of determining the number
of outstanding shares held by any other named beneﬁcial owner. All addresses are c/o United Health
Products, Inc., 10624 S. Eastern Ave., Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052.
(2)Excludes 500,000 shares owned by his spouse and 250,000 shares which the spouse will earn under a
restricted stock unit award. Also excludes 33,000,000 shares Mr. Beplate will earn under a restrictive
stock unit award. See “Item 11.”
(3)Excludes 8,000,000 shares bonus to be delivered to Mr. Schiliro will earn under a restrictive stock unit
award. See “Item 11.”
 
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans.
 
On August 8, 2013, the Board of Directors approved the 2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting
Services Compensation Plan which has 15,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. In
September 2013, the Company issued 6,000,000 shares of stock under said Plan to Douglas Beplate
pursuant to his consulting contract. No options have been granted under the Plan. These shares were sold
or gifted in private transactions.
 
 
28
 
 
 
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE
 
As of December 31, 2018, and 2017, notes payable to related parties totaled $8,121 and $268,328,
respectively. These amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer. During the year ended
December 31, 2018, Mr. Beplate gave a personal vehicle to a scientiﬁc advisor of the Company valued at
$30,000 in lieu of the Company paying travel expenses and consulting expenses. During 2018, the
Company repaid a net amount of $290,207 of the outstanding notes payable balance. During the year
ended December 31, 2017, Mr. Beplate provided loans to the Company of $111,500. These loans were for
operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and have no interest rate.
 
As of December 31, 2018, and 2017, Doug Beplate is owed $25,000 and $86,500, respectively, for
unpaid compensation per his employment agreement.
 
Director Independence
 
Robert Denser is deemed by management to be an independent director of the Company as that
term is deﬁned under Section 10 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
 
Haynie & Company were our independent registered accountants for 2018 and Pritchett Siler &
Hardy PC, are our former independent registered accountants for 2017. The following table sets forth the
fees billed by them for ﬁscal 2018 and 2017 for the categories of services indicated.
 
   Year Ended
December 31, 
   2018  2017 
          
Audit fees  $40,329  $20,500 
Audit-related fees    -0-    -0- 
Tax fees     -0-    -0- 
All other fees    -0-    -0- 
_________  
(1)Other fees include quarterly reviews.
 
Audit fees consist of fees related to professional services rendered in connection with the audit of
our annual ﬁnancial statements and the review of the quarterly ﬁnancial statements. All other fees relate
to other professional services rendered.
  
Audit Committee Pre-Approval Policy
 
We understand the need for the accounting ﬁrm to maintain objectivity and independence in its
audit of our ﬁnancial statements. To minimize relationships that could appear to impair their objectivity,
our Audit Committee has restricted the non-audit services that they may provide to us.
 
 
29
 
 
 
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
(1)Financial Statements
 
The ﬁnancial statements of United Health Products, Inc., supplemental information and report of
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm are included in this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Financial Statement Schedules
 
Schedules have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they are required or
because the required information is included in the ﬁnancial statements or notes thereto.
 
(3)Exhibits
 
(a)Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are ﬁled with this report, or incorporated by reference as noted:
 
3(i)  Articles of Incorporation of the Company dated February 28, 1997. (1)
 
3(ii)  Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (1)
 
3(iii) By-laws of the Company. (2)
 
3(iv) August 2015 Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (3)
 
10.1  Services Agreement with Louis Schiliro (5)
 
10.2  Services Agreement – Nate Knight (4)
 
10.3  January 2015 Services Agreement with Douglas Beplate (6)
 
10.4  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Louis Schiliro*
 
10.5  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Douglas Beplate*
    
21  Subsidiaries of the Registrant – none
 
31.1  Certiﬁcation of Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
 
31.2  Certiﬁcation of Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
 
32.1  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
 
32.2  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
 
99.1  2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (7)
 
101.SCHDocument, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
101.CALCalculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition (*)
101.DEFLinkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)
101.LABLinkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
101.PREPresentation Linkbase (*)
 
 
30
 
 
___________ 
* Filed herewith.
 
(1)Incorporated by reference to the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.
(2)Incorporated by reference to the Company's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
(3)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated August 7, 2015 – date of earliest event ﬁled on August 10,
2015.
(4)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated November 23, 2014.
(5)Incorporated by reference to the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
(6)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 16, 2015.
(7)Incorporated by reference to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015.
 
 
31
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
 Pursuant to the requirements Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the
Registrant has caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
Dated: April 1, 2019 By:/s/ Douglas Beplate
Douglas Beplate
Principal Executive Oﬃcer
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed
below by the following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
 
Signatures Title Date
By:/s/ Douglas Beplate Principal Executive Oﬃcer and April 1, 2019
Douglas Beplate  Chairman of the Board
By:/s/ Nate Knight Principal Financial Oﬃcer and
DirectorApril 1, 2019
Nate Knight
By: /s/ Robert Denser Director April 1, 2019
Robert Denser
 
Douglas Beplate, Nate Knight and Robert Denser represent all the current members of the Board of
Directors.
 
 
32
 
